email,name,title
shimo@cardio.med.tohoku.ac.jp,Hiroaki Shimokawa,RhoA/Rho-Kinase in the Cardiovascular System.
kari.alitalo@helsinki.fi,Kari Alitalo,Lymphatic System in Cardiovascular Medicine.
ilaher@mail.ubc.ca,Ismail Laher,Chronic stress impacts the cardiovascular system: animal models and clinical outcomes.
dimmeler@em.uni-frankfurt.de,Stefanie Dimmeler,Long noncoding RNAs in cardiovascular diseases.
vho@sgul.ac.uk,Wing S V Ho,Cannabinoids in the Cardiovascular System.
g.burnstock@ucl.ac.uk,Geoffrey Burnstock,Purinergic Signaling in the Cardiovascular System.
humin03@sohu.com,Min Hu,Endothelial to mesenchymal transition in the cardiovascular system.
13707486860@163.com,Xiangyu Zhang,Endothelial to mesenchymal transition in the cardiovascular system.
francesco.visioli@unipd.it,Francesco Visioli,"Astaxanthin in cardiovascular health and disease: mechanisms of action, therapeutic merits, and knowledge gaps."
yhattori@med.u-toyama.ac.jp,Yuichi Hattori,Regulation of the Cardiovascular System by Histamine.
pierre.miossec@univ-lyon1.fr,Pierre Miossec,Effects of Interleukin 17 on the cardiovascular system.
atelder@gmail.com,Andrew Elder,How valuable is physical examination of the cardiovascular system?
machalin@pum.edu.pl,Bogusław Machaliński,BDNF - A key player in cardiovascular system.
osadchiy@hst.aau.dk,Oleg E Osadchii,Emerging role of neurotensin in regulation of the cardiovascular system.
patrick.mcnamara@sickkids.ca,Patrick J McNamara,Hemodynamic instability in the critically ill neonate: An approach to cardiovascular support based on disease pathophysiology.
tzera@wum.edu.pl,T Zera,Aldosterone and mineralocorticoid receptors in regulation of the cardiovascular system and pathological remodelling of the heart and arteries.
lgzhang@gwu.edu,Lijie Grace Zhang,3D bioprinting for cardiovascular regeneration and pharmacology.
kiyotake.ishikawa@mssm.edu,Kiyotake Ishikawa,Experimental Models of Cardiovascular Diseases: Overview.
abdelrahmana@ecu.edu,Abdel A Abdel-Rahman,Influence of sex on cardiovascular drug responses: role of estrogen.
samir.ounzain@chuv.ch,Samir Ounzain,Super-enhancer lncs to cardiovascular development and disease.
thierry.pedrazzini@chuv.ch,Thierry Pedrazzini,Super-enhancer lncs to cardiovascular development and disease.
brian-olshansky@uiowa.edu,Brian Olshansky,Vagus nerve modulation of inflammation: Cardiovascular implications.
yliu54@uh.edu,Yu Liu,Earlier and broader roles of Mesp1 in cardiovascular development.
jpcooke@houstonmethodist.org,John P Cooke,How May Proton Pump Inhibitors Impair Cardiovascular Health?
s.osullivan@nottingham.ac.uk,Saoirse Elizabeth O'Sullivan,Endocannabinoids and the Cardiovascular System in Health and Disease.
lyue@uchc.edu,Lixia Yue,Role of TRP channels in the cardiovascular system.
anna.grochot-przeczek@uj.edu.pl,Anna Grochot-Przeczek,Nrf2 in aging - Focus on the cardiovascular system.
jchatham@uab.edu,John C Chatham,Protein O-GlcNAcylation and cardiovascular (patho)physiology.
narula@mountsinai.org,Jagat Narula,Targeted Imaging for Cell Death in Cardiovascular Disorders.
guohuiming@vip.tom.com,Minghui Guo,Effects of imperatorin in the cardiovascular system and cancer.
tanganqier@163.com,Ping Zhu,Effects of imperatorin in the cardiovascular system and cancer.
leslie.leinwand@colorado.edu,Leslie A Leinwand,Molecular Mechanisms Underlying Cardiac Adaptation to Exercise.
dierk.thomas@med.uni-heidelberg.de,Dierk Thomas,Therapeutic targeting of two-pore-domain potassium (K(2P)) channels in the cardiovascular system.
ritadelpinto@gmail.com,Rita Del Pinto,Inflammation-Accelerated Senescence and the Cardiovascular System: Mechanisms and Perspectives.
claudio.ferri@cc.univaq.it,Claudio Ferri,Inflammation-Accelerated Senescence and the Cardiovascular System: Mechanisms and Perspectives.
jlulek@ump.edu.pl,Janina Lulek,S-Nitrosothiols-NO donors regulating cardiovascular cell proliferation: Insight into intracellular pathway alterations.
epsteinj@upenn.edu,Jonathan A Epstein,Semaphorin signaling in cardiovascular development.
manvendra.singh@duke-nus.edu.sg,Manvendra K Singh,Semaphorin signaling in cardiovascular development.
yczhu@shmu.edu.cn,Yi-Chun Zhu,Hydrogen sulphide in cardiovascular system: A cascade from interaction between sulphur atoms and signalling molecules.
carmensb@med.up.pt,Carmen Brás-Silva,Urocortin 2 in cardiovascular health and disease.
celia.marr@rossdales.com,Celia M Marr,The Equine Neonatal Cardiovascular System in Health and Disease.
ghafaris@gmail.com,Samad Ghaffari,Saffron; An updated review on biological properties with special focus on cardiovascular effects.
roshanravann@tbzmed.ac.ir,Neda Roshanravan,Saffron; An updated review on biological properties with special focus on cardiovascular effects.
maurizio.pesce@ccfm.it,Maurizio Pesce,Feeling the right force: How to contextualize the cell mechanical behavior in physiologic turnover and pathologic evolution of the cardiovascular system.
andy.baker@ed.ac.uk,Andrew H Baker,"The function of miR-143, miR-145 and the MiR-143 host gene in cardiovascular development and disease."
tnurkiewicz@hsc.wvu.edu,Timothy R Nurkiewicz,Xenobiotic pulmonary exposure and systemic cardiovascular response via neurological links.
raltara@umc.edu,Raffaele Altara,Emerging importance of chemokine receptor CXCR3 and its ligands in cardiovascular diseases.
chenneke@health.fau.edu,Charles H Hennekens,Hypothesis: Metalloproteinase Inhibitors Decrease Risks of Cardiovascular Disease.
dho@uab.edu,Dao H Ho,Transgenerational epigenetics: the role of maternal effects in cardiovascular development.
rhowden@uncc.edu,Reuben Howden,Nrf2 and cardiovascular defense.
lisa.ayers@nhs.net,Lisa Ayers,Dynamic microvesicle release and clearance within the cardiovascular system: triggers and mechanisms.
a.pironet@ulg.ac.be,Antoine Pironet,Structural identifiability analysis of a cardiovascular system model.
ykawano@hsp.ncvc.go.jp,Yuhei Kawano,Physio-pathological effects of alcohol on the cardiovascular system: its role in hypertension and cardiovascular disease.
bodo.levkau@uni-due.de,Bodo Levkau,Cardiovascular effects of sphingosine-1-phosphate (S1P).
frandics@stanford.edu,Frandics P Chan,Computed tomography and magnetic resonance imaging in neonates with congenital cardiovascular disease.
ivanacms@gmail.com,Ivana C Moraes-Silva,Hypertension and Exercise Training: Evidence from Clinical Studies.
chenchen@tjh.tjmu.edu.cn,Chen Chen,The effects of a 50-Hz magnetic field on the cardiovascular system in rats.
septitchi@mail.ru,I V Ptakhina,[Features of the functional state of the cardiovascular system of long-livers of Pridnestrovie (Transnistria).].
jdeleonluis@yahoo.es,Juan De León-Luis,Cardiovascular System Sonographic Evaluation Algorithm: A New Sonographic Algorithm for Evaluation of the Fetal Cardiovascular System in the Second Trimester.
jorgen.isgaard@medic.gu.se,Jörgen Isgaard,Ghrelin and the cardiovascular system.
s.depascualteresa@csic.es,Sonia de Pascual-Teresa,Molecular mechanisms involved in the cardiovascular and neuroprotective effects of anthocyanins.
akiko.hata@ucsf.edu,Akiko Hata,Functions of microRNAs in cardiovascular biology and disease.
mrconte@asl5.piemonte.it,Maria Rosa Conte,Gender differences in the neurohumoral control of the cardiovascular system.
john.funder@princehenrys.org,John W Funder,Aldosterone and mineralocorticoid receptors in the cardiovascular system.
jhf.diabetes@med.monash.edu.au,H J Teede,Sex hormones and the cardiovascular system: effects on arterial function in women.
rdharvey@medicine.nevada.edu,Robert D Harvey,Muscarinic receptor agonists and antagonists: effects on cardiovascular function.
huxleyv@health.missouri.edu,Virginia H Huxley,Sex and the cardiovascular system: the intriguing tale of how women and men regulate cardiovascular function differently.
shechtes@netvision.net.il,Michael Shechter,Magnesium and cardiovascular system.
yoram@bm.technion.ac.il,Yoram Lanir,Osmotic swelling and residual stress in cardiovascular tissues.
jhaywood@hsc.usc.edu,L Julian Haywood,Cardiovascular function and dysfunction in sickle cell anemia.
abaschat@umm.edu,Ahmet A Baschat,Examination of the fetal cardiovascular system.
adegreco@unina.it,Adelaide Greco,High-Frequency Ultrasound for the Study of Early Mouse Embryonic Cardiovascular System.
afag.rashidova@gmail.com,A M Rashidova,[Study of energy metabolism enzymes and state of cardiovascular system in elderly and senile age patients.].
dhes@medizin.uni-leipzig.de,Stefan Dhein,Pharmacology of gap junctions in the cardiovascular system.
davidtnash@aol.com,David T Nash,Use of vascular ultrasound in clinical trials to evaluate new cardiovascular therapies.
danb@stanford.edu,Daniel Bernstein,Cardiovascular and metabolic alterations in mice lacking beta1- and beta2-adrenergic receptors.
fleenen@ohi-net.heartinst.on.ca,F H Leenen,Cardiovascular consequences of sympathetic hyperactivity.
fadi.salloum@vcuhealth.org,Fadi N Salloum,Relaxin' the Heart: A Novel Therapeutic Modality.
kahl.kai@mh-hannover.de,Kai G Kahl,Effects of psychopharmacological treatment with antipsychotic drugs on the vascular system.
jreckelhoff@umc.edu,Jane F Reckelhoff,Sex Differences in Regulation of Blood Pressure.
claudia.mazo@correounivalle.edu.co,Claudia Mazo,Automatic recognition of fundamental tissues on histology images of the human cardiovascular system.
romartin@wakehealth.edu,R Shayn Martin,Effect of aging on cardiac function plus monitoring and support.
mahsa.jafarigiv@svha.org.au,Mahsa Jafari Giv,Exposure to Amphetamines Leads to Development of Amphetamine Type Stimulants Associated Cardiomyopathy (ATSAC).
ymaru@saitama-med.ac.jp,Yoshiaki Maruyama,Aging and arterial-cardiac interactions in the elderly.
patrick.osei-owusu@drexelmed.edu,Patrick Osei-Owusu,Regulator of G Protein Signaling 2: A Versatile Regulator of Vascular Function.
chapuli@uma.es,Ramón Muñoz-Chápuli,Comparative developmental biology of the cardiac inflow tract.
bradford_berk@urmc.rochester.edu,Bradford C Berk,"Extracellular and Intracellular Cyclophilin A, Native and Post-Translationally Modified, Show Diverse and Specific Pathological Roles in Diseases."
ganss@perkins.uwa.edu.au,Ruth Ganss,Keeping the Balance Right: Regulator of G Protein Signaling 5 in Vascular Physiology and Pathology.
mgharib@caltech.edu,Morteza Gharib,A wave dynamics criterion for optimization of mammalian cardiovascular system.
mkluckow@med.usyd.edu.au,Martin Kluckow,Functional echocardiography in assessment of the cardiovascular system in asphyxiated neonates.
liz.jones@mcgill.ca,Elizabeth A V Jones,The initiation of blood flow and flow induced events in early vascular development.
angelo.avogaro@unipd.it,Angelo Avogaro,[Glucagon like peptide-1 and the cardiovascular system: pathophysiological mechanisms].
drleosher@aol.com,Leo Sher,Effects of heavy alcohol consumption on the cardiovascular system may be mediated in part by the influence of alcohol-induced depression on the immune system.
p.kumar@bham.ac.uk,Prem Kumar,Systemic effects resulting from carotid body stimulation-invited article.
bartosz@gumed.edu.pl,Bartosz Słomiński,New mechanisms of CCR5-Δ32 carriers' advantage - Impact on progenitor cells and renal function.
zefirovtl@mail.ru,T L Zefirov,Effect of Selective Blockade of α2C-Adrenoceptors on Cardiac Activity in Growing Rats.
vidu.garg@utsouthwestern.edu,V Garg,Insights into the genetic basis of congenital heart disease.
zamir@julian.uwo.ca,M Zamir,Fractal dimensions and multifractility in vascular branching.
arog@xanum.uam.mx,A O Rodríguez-González,Arterial flow determined with half Fourier echo-planar imaging.
reliol@libero.it,Aurelio Leone,Interactive effect of combined exposure to active and passive smoking on cardiovascular system.
eva.vanrooij@miragentherapeutics.com,Eva van Rooij,Introduction to the series on microRNAs in the cardiovascular system.
dane.crossley@unt.edu,Dane A 2nd Crossley,Phenotypic plasticity in the common snapping turtle (Chelydra serpentina): long-term physiological effects of chronic hypoxia during embryonic development.
msawicka@ymail.com,Magdalena Sawicka,Potential beneficial effect of some adipokines positively correlated with the adipose tissue content on the cardiovascular system.
sheila.doggrell@bigpond.com,Sheila A Doggrell,Cardiovascular and renal effects of nociceptin/orphanin FQ: a new mediator to target?
kyunginbaek@gmail.com,Kyung In Baek,Advanced microscopy to elucidate cardiovascular injury and regeneration: 4D light-sheet imaging.
ycding@g.ucla.edu,Yichen Ding,Advanced microscopy to elucidate cardiovascular injury and regeneration: 4D light-sheet imaging.
changc4@ucla.edu,Chih-Chiang Chang,Advanced microscopy to elucidate cardiovascular injury and regeneration: 4D light-sheet imaging.
dragonmegan@gmail.com,Megan Chang,Advanced microscopy to elucidate cardiovascular injury and regeneration: 4D light-sheet imaging.
rpackard@mednet.ucla.edu,René R Sevag Packard,Advanced microscopy to elucidate cardiovascular injury and regeneration: 4D light-sheet imaging.
jjhsu@mednet.ucla.edu,Jeffrey J Hsu,Advanced microscopy to elucidate cardiovascular injury and regeneration: 4D light-sheet imaging.
feipeng@hust.edu.cn,Peng Fei,Advanced microscopy to elucidate cardiovascular injury and regeneration: 4D light-sheet imaging.
thsiai@mednet.ucla.edu,Tzung K Hsiai,Advanced microscopy to elucidate cardiovascular injury and regeneration: 4D light-sheet imaging.
julian.pineda21@gmail.com,J A Pineda Zapata,A practical introduction to the hemodynamic analysis of the cardiovascular system with 4D Flow MRI.
peterz@sbrc.ca,Peter Zahradka,"Cardiovascular actions of the peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor-alpha (PPARalpha) agonist Wy14,643."
mnahrendorf@mgh.harvard.edu,Matthias Nahrendorf,Multiparametric Imaging of Organ System Interfaces.
peter.sleight@ctsu.ox.ac.uk,Peter Sleight,A historical perspective on peripheral reflex cardiovascular control from animals to man.
guangjiwang@hotmail.com,Guang-Ji Wang,"Pharmacodynamics and potential synergistic effects of Mai-Luo-Ning injection on cardiovascular protection, based on molecular docking."
hhp_770505@yahoo.com.cn,Hai-Ping Hao,"Pharmacodynamics and potential synergistic effects of Mai-Luo-Ning injection on cardiovascular protection, based on molecular docking."
tokudome@ncvc.go.jp,Takeshi Tokudome,Ghrelin and the heart.
saradanzi@gmail.com,Sara Danzi,Thyroid disease and the cardiovascular system.
badreldeen_ahmed@hotmail.com,Badreldeen Ahmed,"Study of peripheral circulation in non-pregnant, pregnant and pre-eclamptic women using applied potential tomography."
khirano@molcar.med.kyushu-u.ac.jp,Katsuya Hirano,The roles of proteinase-activated receptors in the vascular physiology and pathophysiology.
tanja.wildemann@usask.ca,Tanja M Wildemann,"Cardiovascular responses to lead are biphasic, while methylmercury, but not inorganic mercury, monotonically increases blood pressure in rats."
n.mir@usask.ca,Naghmeh Mirhosseini,"Cardiovascular responses to lead are biphasic, while methylmercury, but not inorganic mercury, monotonically increases blood pressure in rats."
steven.siciliano@usask.ca,Steven D Siciliano,"Cardiovascular responses to lead are biphasic, while methylmercury, but not inorganic mercury, monotonically increases blood pressure in rats."
lynn.weber@usask.ca,Lynn P Weber,"Cardiovascular responses to lead are biphasic, while methylmercury, but not inorganic mercury, monotonically increases blood pressure in rats."
a.cassidy@uea.ac.uk,Aedín Cassidy,Berry anthocyanin intake and cardiovascular health.
schroer.frechen@uni-duesseldorf.de,Karsten Schrör,Aspirin and lipid mediators in the cardiovascular system.
laurent.monassier@unistra.fr,Laurent Monassier,Cardiovascular remodeling and the peripheral serotonergic system.
juan.planagomez@bcm.edu,Juan Carlos Plana,Multi-Modality Imaging in the Assessment of Cardiovascular Toxicity in the Cancer Patient.
pbhansen@health.sdu.dk,Pernille B L Hansen,Functional importance of T-type voltage-gated calcium channels in the cardiovascular and renal system: news from the world of knockout mice.
ertanyetkin@hotmail.com,Ertan Yetkin,Golden Ratio and the heart: A review of divine aesthetics.
antoniad@well.ox.ac.uk,Charalambos Antoniades,The role of adipose tissue in cardiovascular health and disease.
hamlin.1@osu.edu,Robert L Hamlin,A search to predict potential for drug-induced cardiovascular toxicity.
alberto.arencibia@ulpgc.es,A Arencibia,Anatomical assessment of intrathoracic cardiovascular structures using fast spin-echo double inversion recovery and steady-state free precession magnetic resonance imaging in a normal cat.
stephan.scholz@uni-rostock.de,Stephan Scholz,"Constant morphological patterns in the hemolymph vascular system of crayfish (Crustacea, Decapoda)."
gbeller@virginia.edu,George A Beller,A proposal for an advanced cardiovascular imaging training track.
thomasbourdrel@yahoo.fr,Thomas Bourdrel,Cardiovascular effects of air pollution.
frederic.a.dallaire@usherbrooke.ca,Frederic Dallaire,Growth of Cardiovascular Structures from the Fetus to the Young Adult.
joni.maki@oulu.fi,Joni M Mäki,Lysyl oxidases in mammalian development and certain pathological conditions.
sksze@ntu.edu.sg,Siu Kwan Sze,Degenerative protein modifications in the aging vasculature and central nervous system: A problem shared is not always halved.
rhuttary@zedat.fu-berlin.de,Rudolf Huttary,"Simulation, identification and statistical variation in cardiovascular analysis (SISCA) - A software framework for multi-compartment lumped modeling."
hanjar@utu.fi,Hannu Järveläinen,Extracellular Matrix Macromolecules as Potential Targets of Cardiovascular Pharmacotherapy.
turkey.filiz.ozerkan@ege.edu.tr,Filiz Özerkan Çakan,[Changes in cardiovascular physiology in the elderly].
karen.tran4@vch.ca,Karen C Tran,Efficacy of Calcium Channel Blockers on Major Cardiovascular Outcomes for the Treatment of Hypertension in Asian Populations: A Meta-analysis.
e.lari@uleth.ca,Ebrahim Lari,"Effects of oil sands process-affected water on the respiratory and circulatory system of Daphnia magna Straus, 1820."
thum.thomas@mh-hannover.de,Thomas Thum,Long noncoding RNAs and microRNAs in cardiovascular pathophysiology.
terri.allen@bakeridi.edu.au,Terri J Allen,Angiotensin II type 2 receptor (AT2R) in renal and cardiovascular disease.
s.buczinski@umontreal.ca,Sébastien Buczinski,Cardiovascular ultrasonography in cattle.
alberto.ferrari@unimib.it,Alberto U Ferrari,Modifications of the cardiovascular system with aging.
rbond12@northwell.edu,Rachel M Bond,FDA labeling of NSAIDs: Review of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs in cardiovascular disease.
abond01@biph.kiev.ua,Alexander I Bondarenko,Cannabinoids and Cardiovascular System.
jason.l.johnson@bristol.ac.uk,Jason L Johnson,Elucidating the contributory role of microRNA to cardiovascular diseases (a review).
wattss@msu.edu,Stephanie W Watts,The love of a lifetime: 5-HT in the cardiovascular system.
dchalloumas@hotmail.co.uk,Dimitrios Challoumas,Effects of combined vitamin D--calcium supplements on the cardiovascular system: should we be cautious?
jabe@mdanderson.org,Jun-Ichi Abe,Coordination of Cellular Localization-Dependent Effects of Sumoylation in Regulating Cardiovascular and Neurological Diseases.
hliu@faculty.chiba-u.jp,Hao Liu,"Multiscale modeling of the cardiovascular system for infants, children, and adolescents: Age-related alterations in cardiovascular parameters and hemodynamics."
john.simpson@gstt.sthames.nhs.uk,John Simpson,Echocardiographic evaluation of cardiac function in the fetus.
johnkjli@soe.rutgers.edu,John K-J Li,"Cardiovascular Allometry: Analysis, Methodology, and Clinical Applications."
xitongdang1024@swmu.edu.cn,Xitong Dang,Potential functions of esophageal cancer-related gene-4 in the cardiovascular system.
tmartino@uoguelph.ca,Tami A Martino,Consequences of Circadian and Sleep Disturbances for the Cardiovascular System.
nikmah@ikafkui.org,Nikmah S Idris,Cardiovascular manifestations of HIV infection in children.
zanzonip@mskcc.org,Pat Zanzonico,Radiobiology in Cardiovascular Imaging.
amteshwarjaggi@gmail.com,Amteshwar Singh Jaggi,TRPV4 channels: physiological and pathological role in cardiovascular system.
echoshih@163.com,Xiaoping Chen,Applications of three-dimensional printing technology in the cardiovascular field.
sth100@mail.usak.ca,Salma Toma Hanna,Nicotine effect on cardiovascular system and ion channels.
saeed.yaghfoori@gmail.com,Saeed Yaghfoori,An experimental ovine Theileriosis: The effect of Theileria lestoquardi infection on cardiovascular system in sheep.
razmi@um.ac.ir,Gholam Reza Razmi,An experimental ovine Theileriosis: The effect of Theileria lestoquardi infection on cardiovascular system in sheep.
mohri@ferdowsi.um.ac.ir,Mehrdad Mohri,An experimental ovine Theileriosis: The effect of Theileria lestoquardi infection on cardiovascular system in sheep.
razavizadeh@um.ac.ir,Ali Reza Taghavi Razavizadeh,An experimental ovine Theileriosis: The effect of Theileria lestoquardi infection on cardiovascular system in sheep.
armov@um.ac.ir,Ahmad Reza Movassaghi,An experimental ovine Theileriosis: The effect of Theileria lestoquardi infection on cardiovascular system in sheep.
monte_willis@med.unc.edu,Monte S Willis,SWI/SNF chromatin-remodeling complexes in cardiovascular development and disease.
scott_bultman@med.unc.edu,Scott J Bultman,SWI/SNF chromatin-remodeling complexes in cardiovascular development and disease.
dawson@nadn.navy.mil,T H Dawson,Similitude in the cardiovascular system of mammals.
hernandovargasu10@yahoo.com,Hernando Vargas-Uricoechea,Effects of thyroid hormones on the heart.
d.pennell@imperial.ac.uk,Dudley J Pennell,Cardiovascular magnetic resonance and the role of adenosine pharmacologic stress.
kwt@tobis.pl,Katarzyna Wieczorowska-Tobis,[Organ alterations due to aging].
steve_a_douglas@gsk.com,Stephen A Douglas,Human urotensin-II as a novel cardiovascular target: 'heart' of the matter or simply a fishy 'tail'?
ramirthalingamthandavarayan@houstonmethodist.org,Rajarajan A Thandavarayan,The senescence accelerated mouse prone 8 (SAMP8): A novel murine model for cardiac aging.
jcduan@ccmu.edu.cn,Junchao Duan,Microarray-based bioinformatics analysis of the combined effects of SiNPs and PbAc on cardiovascular system in zebrafish.
manuel.mayr@kcl.ac.uk,Manuel Mayr,Systems biology-opportunities and challenges: the application of proteomics to study the cardiovascular extracellular matrix.
colao@unina.it,Annamaria Colao,The GH-IGF-I axis and the cardiovascular system: clinical implications.
v.orlova@lumc.nl,Valeria V Orlova,BMP-SMAD signaling: From pluripotent stem cells to cardiovascular commitment.
ross.vlahos@rmit.edu.au,Ross Vlahos,New frontiers in the treatment of comorbid cardiovascular disease in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
teresa.kennedy-lydon@imperial.ac.uk,Teresa Kennedy-Lydon,Immune Functions and Properties of Resident Cells in the Heart and Cardiovascular System: Pericytes.
cjiang@gsu.edu,Chun Jiang,Optogenetic approach for functional assays of the cardiovascular system by light activation of the vascular smooth muscle.
schiffrin@ircm.qc.ca,Ernesto L Schiffrin,Vascular and cardiac benefits of angiotensin receptor blockers.
masavasc@tmd.ac.jp,Masayuki Yoshida,Potential role of statins in inflammation and atherosclerosis.
dfer513@gmail.com,David J Ferland,Chemerin: A comprehensive review elucidating the need for cardiovascular research.
numata@fukuoka-u.ac.jp,Tomohiro Numata,"""TRP inflammation"" relationship in cardiovascular system."
inouery@fukuoka-u.ac.jp,Ryuji Inoue,"""TRP inflammation"" relationship in cardiovascular system."
benjamin.owen@manchester.ac.uk,Benjamin Owen,Structural modelling of the cardiovascular system.
rtostes@usp.br,Rita C Tostes,Reactive oxygen species: players in the cardiovascular effects of testosterone.
arunk@udel.edu,A Kumar,"Thymosin β4: Roles in Development, Repair, and Engineering of the Cardiovascular System."
d.g.hardie@dundee.ac.uk,Ian P Salt,AMP-Activated Protein Kinase: An Ubiquitous Signaling Pathway With Key Roles in the Cardiovascular System.
nsarrafzadegan@gmail.com,Nizal Sarrafzadegan,Cardiovascular disease and cancer: Evidence for shared disease pathways and pharmacologic prevention.
carrie.lenneman@louisville.edu,Carrie G Lenneman,Cardio-Oncology: An Update on Cardiotoxicity of Cancer-Related Treatment.
susan.pyner@durham.ac.uk,Susan Pyner,The paraventricular nucleus and heart failure.
soile.tapio@helmholtz-muenchen.de,Soile Tapio,"Ionizing radiation effects on cells, organelles and tissues on proteome level."
mkpugsley@yahoo.com,Michael K Pugsley,Charge is an important determinant of hemodynamic and adverse cardiovascular effects of cationic drugs.
m.hoxha@unizkm.al,Malvina Hoxha,Potential role of leukotriene receptor antagonists in reducing cardiovascular and cerbrovascular risk: A systematic review of human clinical trials and in vivo animal studies.
r.brandes@em.uni-frankfurt.de,Ralf P Brandes,Redox-mediated signal transduction by cardiovascular Nox NADPH oxidases.
heinke@hia.rwth-aachen.de,Stefanie Heinke,Modeling a healthy and a person with heart failure conditions using the object-oriented modeling environment Dymola.
yhellsten@nexs.ku.dk,Ylva Hellsten,Effects of exercise training and resveratrol on vascular health in aging.
roberthenningmd@gmail.com,Robert J Henning,Poly(ADP-ribose) Polymerase (PARP) and PARP Inhibitors: Mechanisms of Action and Role in Cardiovascular Disorders.
dongdeli@ems.hrbmu.edu.cn,De-Li Dong,Calcium-Activated Potassium Channels: Potential Target for Cardiovascular Diseases.
jure_mirat@yahoo.com,Jure Mirat,[Physical activity in the prevention and treatment of cardiovascular diseases].
wxyang@spermlab.org,Wan-Xi Yang,SOX family transcription factors involved in diverse cellular events during development.
amteshwarjaggi@yahoo.co.in,Amteshwar Singh Jaggi,TRPV(1) channels in cardiovascular system: A double edged sword?
kgriend@emory.edu,Kathy K Griendling,Regulation of signal transduction by reactive oxygen species in the cardiovascular system.
cantinotti@ftgm.it,Massimiliano Cantinotti,"Echocardiographic nomograms for ventricular, valvular and arterial dimensions in caucasian children with a special focus on neonates, infants and toddlers."
fsellke@lifespan.org,Frank W Sellke,Attenuation of inflammatory responses by hydrogen sulfide (H₂S) in ischemia/reperfusion injury.
i.reid@auckland.ac.nz,Ian R Reid,Cardiovascular effects of calcium supplements.
linchering@163.com,Lin Che,"The Effects of Exercise on Cardiovascular Biomarkers: New Insights, Recent Data, and Applications."
watrous@zargis.com,Raymond L Watrous,A computational model of cardiovascular physiology and heart sound generation.
lawson4001@zju.edu.cn,Zhenjie Liu,Impact of dipeptidyl-peptidase 4 inhibitors on cardiovascular diseases.
dpollock@uab.edu,David M Pollock,Circadian regulation of cardiovascular and kidney function.
p.scambler@ucl.ac.uk,Peter J Scambler,A critical role for the chromatin remodeller CHD7 in anterior mesoderm during cardiovascular development.
giovanni.camici@uzh.ch,Giovanni G Camici,The Aging Cardiovascular System: Understanding It at the Cellular and Clinical Levels.
k.woollard@imperial.ac.uk,Kevin Woollard,Atherosclerosis.
yugurf@yandex.ru,Yu I Gurfinkel,Effect of zero magnetic field on cardiovascular system and microcirculation.
vera.ralevic@nottingham.ac.uk,Vera Ralevic,P2X receptors in the cardiovascular system and their potential as therapeutic targets in disease.
timothy.hla@childrens.harvard.edu,Timothy Hla,Sphingosine 1-phosphate: Lipid signaling in pathology and therapy.
andrea.natali@med.unipi.it,A Natali,Metformin effects on the heart and the cardiovascular system: A review of experimental and clinical data.
simona.greco@grupposandonato.it,Simona Greco,Long Noncoding Competing Endogenous RNA Networks in Age-Associated Cardiovascular Diseases.
carlo.gaetano@icsmaugeri.it,Carlo Gaetano,Long Noncoding Competing Endogenous RNA Networks in Age-Associated Cardiovascular Diseases.
fabio.martelli@grupposandonato.it,Fabio Martelli,Long Noncoding Competing Endogenous RNA Networks in Age-Associated Cardiovascular Diseases.
baoxue@bjmu.edu.cn,Baoxue Yang,Protective Effect of Ganoderma (Lingzhi) on Cardiovascular System.
zhongyilimeng@163.com,Meng Li,Crosstalk between Autophagy and Apoptosis: Potential and Emerging Therapeutic Targets for Cardiac Diseases.
doctorgaoping@sina.com,Ping Gao,Crosstalk between Autophagy and Apoptosis: Potential and Emerging Therapeutic Targets for Cardiac Diseases.
tjzhtcm@163.com,Junping Zhang,Crosstalk between Autophagy and Apoptosis: Potential and Emerging Therapeutic Targets for Cardiac Diseases.
glenn_fishman@smtplink.mssm.edu,G I Fishman,Timing is everything in life: conditional transgene expression in the cardiovascular system.
a.nenna@unicampus.it,Antonio Nenna,Changes of the coronary arteries and cardiac microvasculature with aging: Implications for translational research and clinical practice.
znxia@cqu.edu.cn,Zhining Xia,The cardiovascular toxicity induced by high doses of gatifloxacin and ciprofloxacin in zebrafish.
maikawa@rics.bwh.harvard.edu,Masanori Aikawa,Delta-Like Ligand 4-Notch Signaling in Macrophage Activation.
adc51@zips.uakron.edu,Alysha D Cypher,Bisphenol A alters the cardiovascular response to hypoxia in Danio rerio embryos.
shekhar.kunal09@gmail.com,Shekhar Kunal,Cardiovascular system and COVID-19: perspectives from a developing country.
kashishgupta8@yahoo.com,Kashish Gupta,Cardiovascular system and COVID-19: perspectives from a developing country.
drshashimohansharma@gmail.com,Shashi Mohan Sharma,Cardiovascular system and COVID-19: perspectives from a developing country.
vijalp2000@gmail.com,Vijay Pathak,Cardiovascular system and COVID-19: perspectives from a developing country.
srgh07@gmail.com,Shruti Mittal,Cardiovascular system and COVID-19: perspectives from a developing country.
drtarkecr@gmail.com,Chandrakant Tarke,Cardiovascular system and COVID-19: perspectives from a developing country.
davisgeo@health.missouri.edu,George E Davis,Matricryptic sites control tissue injury responses in the cardiovascular system: relationships to pattern recognition receptor regulated events.
abrozmanova@jfmed.uniba.sk,A Brozmanová,[Baroreflex regulation of the cardiovascular system during hyperthermia].
triggle@buffalo.edu,David J Triggle,"1,4-Dihydropyridines as calcium channel ligands and privileged structures."
patfiz@asklepios.am.lublin.pl,Jerzy Bełtowski,[Hydrogen sulfide as a biologically active mediator in the cardiovascular system].
gaoheren19840513@126.com,He-Ren Gao,Cardiovascular functions of central corticotropin-releasing factor related peptides system.
d.strain@exeter.ac.uk,W David Strain,"Diabetes, cardiovascular disease and the microcirculation."
honore@ipmc.cnrs.fr,Eric Honoré,Piezo Ion Channels in Cardiovascular Mechanobiology.
dmann@dom.wustl.edu,Douglas L Mann,The emerging role of innate immunity in the heart and vascular system: for whom the cell tolls.
a.h.opexob@gmail.com,Alexander N Orekhov,Impact of the cardiovascular system-associated adipose tissue on atherosclerotic pathology.
cecile.vindis@inserm.fr,Cécile Vindis,Autophagy in health and disease: focus on the cardiovascular system.
helmut.hinghofer@medunigraz.at,Helmut Hinghofer-Szalkay,"Gravity, the hydrostatic indifference concept and the cardiovascular system."
shokoufeh.mahmoodzadeh@mdc-berlin.de,Shokoufeh Mahmoodzadeh,Targeted basic research to highlight the role of estrogen and estrogen receptors in the cardiovascular system.
cyan@medicine.bsd.uchicago.edu,Yan C Li,Vitamin D: roles in renal and cardiovascular protection.
m.bakouri@mu.edu.sa,Mohsen Bakouri,Evaluation of an advanced model reference sliding mode control method for cardiac assist device using a numerical model.
s.malpas@auckland.ac.nz,Simon C Malpas,Neural influences on cardiovascular variability: possibilities and pitfalls.
b.stavrou@ic.ac.uk,Brigitte Maria Stavrou,Diadenosine polyphosphates: postulated mechanisms mediating the cardiac effects.
fringsd@lsbu.ac.uk,Daniel Frings,Levels of craving influence psychological challenge and physiological reactivity.
paulveterin@yahoo.com,Pavlos P Lelovas,A comparative anatomic and physiologic overview of the porcine heart.
marianne.zeller@u-bourgogne.fr,Marianne Zeller,"Smokeless tobacco, sport and the heart."
caroline.sevoz-couche@upmc.fr,Caroline Sévoz-Couche,Vulnerability to stress consequences induced by repeated social defeat in rats: Contribution of the angiotensin II type 1 receptor in cardiovascular alterations associated to low brain derived neurotrophic factor.
imanaka@doc.medic.mie-u.ac.jp,Kyoko Imanaka-Yoshida,Tenascin-C in cardiovascular tissue remodeling: from development to inflammation and repair.
stapleton@eohsi.rutgers.edu,Phoebe A Stapleton,"Cardiopulmonary consequences of gestational toxicant exposure: Symposium overview at the 56th annual SOT meeting, Baltimore, MD."
lynette.rogers@nationwidechildrens.org,Lynette K Rogers,"Cardiopulmonary consequences of gestational toxicant exposure: Symposium overview at the 56th annual SOT meeting, Baltimore, MD."
nina.zigon@med.bg.ac.rs,Nina Japundžić-Žigon,"Vasopressin, Central Autonomic Control and Blood Pressure Regulation."
olga@kolt.infran.ru,O A Lyubashina,Antinociceptive effect of the agonist of 5-HT1A receptors buspirone in the model of abdominal pain in dogs.
pputha@midwestern.edu,Prasanth Puthanveetil,FoxO1-miRNA interacting networks as potential targets for mitochondrial diseases.
michael.parmacek@uphs.upenn.edu,Michael S Parmacek,Myocardin-related transcription factors: critical coactivators regulating cardiovascular development and adaptation.
cavigell@balgrist.unizh.ch,A Cavigelli,[Cardiovascular disorders in paraplegic patients].
andrea_corsonello@tin.it,Andrea Corsonello,Cardiovascular and non-cardiovascular concerns with proton pump inhibitors: Are they safe?
javorka@jfmed.uniba.sk,K Javorka,[The autonomic nervous system and hypertension].
magdalena.dvorakova@lfp.cuni.cz,Magdalena Chottová Dvoráková,Cardioprotective role of the VIP signaling system.
jhurst@emory.edu,J Willis Hurst,Would different routine precordial electrode positions be more useful? Answer: not likely.
fleming@em.uni-frankfurt.de,I Fleming,Cytochrome p450 and vascular homeostasis.
ellen.g.mcmahon@monsanto.com,E G McMahon,"Recent studies with eplerenone, a novel selective aldosterone receptor antagonist."
irambch@qau.edu.pk,Iram Murtaza,An Overview of Non-coding RNAs and Cardiovascular System.
jmauderl@lrri.org,J L Mauderly,Animal models for the effect of age on susceptibility to inhaled particulate matter.
jean-francois.argacha@uzbrussel.be,Jean François Argacha,Ecology of the cardiovascular system: A focus on air-related environmental factors.
thorsten.kirsch@nyumc.org,Thorsten Kirsch,Biomineralization--an active or passive process?
gmitrovj@yahoo.com,Juraj Gmitrov,Static magnetic field effect on the arterial baroreflex-mediated control of microcirculation: implications for cardiovascular effects due to environmental magnetic fields.
258750040@qq.com,Youxiu Yao,Effects of propofol and etomidate anesthesia on cardiovascular miRNA expression: the different profiles?
c.bondonno@ecu.edu.au,Catherine P Bondonno,Vegetable-derived bioactive nitrate and cardiovascular health.
lauren.blekkenhorst@research.uwa.edu.au,Lauren C Blekkenhorst,Vegetable-derived bioactive nitrate and cardiovascular health.
alexhcliu@163.com,Alex H Liu,Vegetable-derived bioactive nitrate and cardiovascular health.
nicola.bondonno@uwa.edu.au,Nicola P Bondonno,Vegetable-derived bioactive nitrate and cardiovascular health.
natalie.ward@uwa.edu.au,Natalie C Ward,Vegetable-derived bioactive nitrate and cardiovascular health.
kevin.croft@uwa.edu.au,Kevin D Croft,Vegetable-derived bioactive nitrate and cardiovascular health.
jonathan.hodgson@ecu.edu.au,Jonathan M Hodgson,Vegetable-derived bioactive nitrate and cardiovascular health.
herrmann.joerg@mayo.edu,Joerg Herrmann,Exercise Training and Cardiovascular Health in Cancer Patients.
nburford3989@gmail.com,Natalie G Burford,Hypothalamic-Pituitary-Adrenal Axis Modulation of Glucocorticoids in the Cardiovascular System.
nwebst@lsuhsc.edu,Natalia A Webster,Hypothalamic-Pituitary-Adrenal Axis Modulation of Glucocorticoids in the Cardiovascular System.
dcruz2@lsuhsc.edu,Diana Cruz-Topete,Hypothalamic-Pituitary-Adrenal Axis Modulation of Glucocorticoids in the Cardiovascular System.
neal.benowitz@ucsf.edu,Neal L Benowitz,Cardiovascular toxicity of nicotine: Implications for electronic cigarette use.
rudi.vennekens@med.kuleuven.be,Rudi Vennekens,Emerging concepts for the role of TRP channels in the cardiovascular system.
zhangc3@umdnj.edu,Chunxiang Zhang,MicroRNAs: role in cardiovascular biology and disease.
grace.paul@nationwidechildrens.org,Grace R Paul,Sleep and the Cardiovascular System in Children.
ibraheem_muhammed@yahoo.com,Ibrahim M Salman,Major Autonomic Neuroregulatory Pathways Underlying Short- and Long-Term Control of Cardiovascular Function.
carolinaj@biol.unlp.edu.ar,Carolina Jaquenod De Giusti,Exosomal non-coding RNAs (Exo-ncRNAs) in cardiovascular health.
sdas11@jhmi.edu,Samarjit Das,Exosomal non-coding RNAs (Exo-ncRNAs) in cardiovascular health.
patrizia.nigro@ccfm.it,Patrizia Nigro,Peptidyl-prolyl isomerases: a full cast of critical actors in cardiovascular diseases.
bauer.sumpio@yale.edu,Bauer Sumpio,Systemic and cell-specific mechanisms of vasculopathy induced by human immunodeficiency virus and highly active antiretroviral therapy.
waldemar.moll@vkl.kuni-regensburg.de,W Moll,Venous return in the fetal-placental cardiovascular system.
harald.quick@imp.uni-erlangen.de,Harald H Quick,Interventional MRI in the cardiovascular system.
tim.demeyer@ugent.be,Tim De Meyer,Telomere Length as Cardiovascular Aging Biomarker: JACC Review Topic of the Week.
loris.grossi@unibo.it,Loris Grossi,Hydrogen sulfide induces nitric oxide release from nitrite.
cechetto@uwo.ca,David F Cechetto,Cortical control of the autonomic nervous system.
tsutomu.kume@vanderbilt.edu,Tsutomu Kume,The cooperative roles of Foxc1 and Foxc2 in cardiovascular development.
frantisek.kristek@savba.sk,Frantisek Kristek,Some peculiar effects of NO-synthase inhibition on the structure and function of cardiovascular system.
steven.p.jones@louisville.edu,Steven P Jones,O-GlcNAc and the cardiovascular system.
martachagas2@yahoo.com.br,Marta Chagas Monteiro,Action mechanism and cardiovascular effect of anthocyanins: a systematic review of animal and human studies.
nasimi@med.mui.ac.ir,Ali Nasimi,Angiotensin II in the paraventricular nucleus stimulates sympathetic outflow to the cardiovascular system and make vasopressin release in rat.
aaknowlton@ucdavis.edu,A A Knowlton,Exosomes as agents of change in the cardiovascular system.
manu.platt@bme.gatech.edu,Manu O Platt,Endothelial cells and cathepsins: Biochemical and biomechanical regulation.
ashockey@gatech.edu,W Andrew Shockey,Endothelial cells and cathepsins: Biochemical and biomechanical regulation.
seppo.kahkonen@helsinki.fi,Seppo Kähkönen,Mechanisms of cardiovascular dysregulation during alcohol withdrawal.
matthew.winter@astrazeneca.com,Matthew J Winter,A multi-endpoint in vivo larval zebrafish (Danio rerio) model for the assessment of integrated cardiovascular function.
tmuenzel@uni-mainz.de,Thomas Münzel,Inorganic nitrite and nitrate in cardiovascular therapy: A better alternative to organic nitrates as nitric oxide donors?
dmayorov@unimelb.edu.au,Dmitry N Mayorov,Brain angiotensin AT1 receptors as specific regulators of cardiovascular reactivity to acute psychoemotional stress.
justbarr@gmail.com,Justin Barr,Vascular medicine and surgery in ancient Egypt.
guptad@mskcc.org,Dipti Gupta,The changes in cardiac physiology with aging and the implications for the treating oncologist.
zwsun@ccmu.edu.cn,Zhiwei Sun,Comprehensive gene and microRNA expression profiling on cardiovascular system in zebrafish co-exposured of SiNPs and MeHg.
jjm1003@medschl.cam.ac.uk,Janet J Maguire,Discovering orphan receptor function using human in vitro pharmacology.
joao.hcsilva@ufpe.br,J H Costa-Silva,Maternal low-protein diet induces changes in the cardiovascular autonomic modulation in male rat offspring.
karl-juergen.baer@med.uni-jena.de,Karl-Jürgen Bär,Diverse autonomic regulation of pupillary function and the cardiovascular system during alcohol withdrawal.
matsuk@hiroshima-u.ac.jp,Kanji Matsukawa,Central command: control of cardiac sympathetic and vagal efferent nerve activity and the arterial baroreflex during spontaneous motor behaviour in animals.
snaderi@stanford.edu,Sahar Naderi,Testosterone Replacement Therapy and the Cardiovascular System.
chepo@mail.com,Jose Francisco Islas,A MicroRNA Perspective on Cardiovascular Development and Diseases: An Update.
jemoreno@itesm.mx,Jorge Eugenio Moreno-Cuevas,A MicroRNA Perspective on Cardiovascular Development and Diseases: An Update.
sgupta1@iu.edu,Samir K Gupta,"A randomized, controlled trial of the effect of rilpivirine versus efavirenz on cardiovascular risk in healthy volunteers."
a.vanharen-maassenvandenbrink@erasmusmc.nl,Antoinette Maassen van den Brink,Understanding CGRP and Cardiovascular Risk.
ysu@gru.edu,Yunchao Su,The critical role of Akt in cardiovascular function.
jjochem@poczta.onet.pl,Jerzy Jochem,The role of the histaminergic system in the central cardiovascular regulation in haemorrhagic hypotension.
giacobellis@med.miami.edu,Gianluca Iacobellis,Epicardial fat: a new cardiovascular therapeutic target.
jwyneken@fau.edu,Jeanette Wyneken,Normal reptile heart morphology and function.
al806@nova.edu,Anastasios Lymperopoulos,Biased agonism/antagonism at the AngII-AT1 receptor: Implications for adrenal aldosterone production and cardiovascular therapy.
achatzak@med.duth.gr,Ekaterini Chatzaki,Do urocortins have a role in treating cardiovascular disease?
h-j.gallowitsch@lkh-klu.at,Hans-Jürgen Gallowitsch,[Thyroid and cardiovascular system].
revermann@vrc.uni-frankfurt.de,Marc Revermann,Pharmacological inhibition of the soluble epoxide hydrolase-from mouse to man.
jonesmcb@uoguelph.ca,Nina Jones,"Requisite role for Nck adaptors in cardiovascular development, endothelial-to-mesenchymal transition, and directed cell migration."
rstclair@wfubmc.edu,R W St Clair,Estrogens and atherosclerosis: phytoestrogens and selective estrogen receptor modulators.
bikod@email.chop.edu,David M Biko,Pediatric Considerations in Computed Tomographic Angiography.
stephen.siegel@nyumc.org,Stephen A Siegel,Cardiovascular issues in boxing and contact sports.
mahatam@sums.ac.ir,Masoumeh Hatam,"α(2) Receptors in the lateral parabrachial nucleus generates the pressor response of the cardiovascular chemoreflex, effects of GABA(A) receptor."
francois-abboud@uiowa.edu,François M Abboud,Autonomic regulation of the immune system in cardiovascular diseases.
liuhr2000@ccmu.edu.cn,Huirong Liu,The mechanisms behind decreased internalization of angiotensin II type 1 receptor.
francisco.azuaje@crp-sante.lu,Francisco Azuaje,Drug interaction networks: an introduction to translational and clinical applications.
jwilliams5@partners.org,Jonathan S Williams,Evolving research in nongenomic actions of aldosterone.
shivak@sctimst.ker.nic.in,K Shivakumar,Pro-fibrogenic effects of magnesium deficiency in the cardiovascular system.
gs2620@cumc.columbia.edu,Gaetano Santulli,Adrenergic signaling in heart failure and cardiovascular aging.
giaccarino@unisa.it,Guido Iaccarino,Adrenergic signaling in heart failure and cardiovascular aging.
lbeyer@gradientcorp.com,Leslie A Beyer,Review of animal studies on the cardiovascular effects of caffeine.
mhixon@gradientcorp.com,Mary L Hixon,Review of animal studies on the cardiovascular effects of caffeine.
rtpeterson@mgh.harvard.edu,Randall T Peterson,The zebrafish as a tool to identify novel therapies for human cardiovascular disease.
bernd.pelster@uibk.ac.at,Bernd Pelster,"Developmental plasticity in the cardiovascular system of fish, with special reference to the zebrafish."
zsjianglab@aliyun.com,Zhi-Sheng Jiang,SIRT1 in cardiovascular aging.
xjli@bjmu.edu.cn,Xuejun Li,Aquaporins in Cardiovascular System.
mcmahon@acs.ucalgary.ca,B R McMahon,Control of cardiovascular function and its evolution in Crustacea.
yapeiwang@ruc.edu.cn,Yapei Wang,Combined toxicity of silica nanoparticles and methylmercury on cardiovascular system in zebrafish (Danio rerio) embryos.
georg.zettinig@univie.ac.at,G Zettinig,[Hypothyroidism and the heart].
gunnar.wallin@neuro.gu.se,B Gunnar Wallin,Interindividual differences in muscle sympathetic nerve activity: a key to new insight into cardiovascular regulation?
gratacos@clinic.ub.es,Eduard Gratacós,A fetal cardiovascular score to predict infant hypertension and arterial remodeling in intrauterine growth restriction.
huwei123@fmmu.edu.cn,Wei Hu,Understanding the role of mammalian sterile 20-like kinase 1 (MST1) in cardiovascular disorders.
dongdongsunxijing@163.com,Dongdong Sun,Understanding the role of mammalian sterile 20-like kinase 1 (MST1) in cardiovascular disorders.
ablaber@sfu.ca,Andrew P Blaber,Physiological interdependence of the cardiovascular and postural control systems under orthostatic stress.
juskucin@pg.gda.pl,J Kucinska-Lipka,Fabrication of polyurethane and polyurethane based composite fibres by the electrospinning technique for soft tissue engineering of cardiovascular system.
ribatti@anatomia.uniba.it,Domenico Ribatti,Genetic and epigenetic mechanisms in the early development of the vascular system.
mufnal@wum.edu.pl,Marcin Ufnal,Central Administration of H(2)S Donors for Studying Cardiovascular Effects of H(2)S in Rats.
david.sedmera@lf1.cuni.cz,David Sedmera,Function and form in the developing cardiovascular system.
mbader@mdc-berlin.de,Michael Bader,"Highlights of the 13th Annual Meeting of the European Council for Cardiovascular Research. 13th Annual Meeting of the European Council for Cardiovascular Research (ECCR). Nice, France, 10-12 October, 2008."
henriques.coelho@gmail.com,Tiago Henriques-Coelho,Cardiovascular effects of the angiotensin type 2 receptor.
nwenger@emory.edu,Nanette K Wenger,Gender disparity in cardiovascular disease: bias or biology?
aparnapat@yahoo.com,Aparna Kulkarni,Remodeling of the cardiovascular circulation in fetuses of mothers with diabetes: A fetal computational model analysis.
valeryeskov@gmail.com,V M Eskov,[Сhaotic dynamics of cardio-intervals in three age groups of indigenous and non-indigenous population of Ugra].
giuliano.tocci@uniroma1.it,G Tocci,Clinical management of patients with hypertension and high cardiovascular risk in specialised centers and in general practice. Analysis from an Italian Survey Questionnaire.
zhugn@zju.edu.cn,Guo-Nian Zhu,The cardiovascular toxicity of triadimefon in early life stage of zebrafish and potential implications to human health.
p.dinicolo@hotmail.it,Pierpaolo Di Nicolò,Renal Resistive Index: not only kidney.
emma@spirit.gcrc.upenn.edu,Emma A Meagher,Cardiovascular and renovascular implications of COX-2 inhibition.
yotayota@develop.zool.kyoto-u.ac.jp,Yoshiko Takahashi,Blood flow-mediated gene transfer and siRNA-knockdown in the developing vasculature in a spatio-temporally controlled manner in chicken embryos.
leo.joosten@radboudumc.nl,Leo A B Joosten,Interleukin-32 in chronic inflammatory conditions is associated with a higher risk of cardiovascular diseases.
tdesaive@ulg.ac.be,Thomas Desaive,Model-based computation of total stressed blood volume from a preload reduction manoeuvre.
geoff.chase@canterbury.ac.nz,J Geoffrey Chase,Model-based computation of total stressed blood volume from a preload reduction manoeuvre.
ph.morimont@chu.ulg.ac.be,Philippe Morimont,Model-based computation of total stressed blood volume from a preload reduction manoeuvre.
pc.dauby@ulg.ac.be,Pierre C Dauby,Model-based computation of total stressed blood volume from a preload reduction manoeuvre.
joel.karliner@med.va.gov,Joel S Karliner,Lysophospholipids and the cardiovascular system.
ade5r@virginia.edu,A D Everett,"Identification, cloning, and developmental expression of hepatoma-derived growth factor in the developing rat heart."
t.muka@erasmusmc.nl,Taulant Muka,Estrogen receptor β actions in the female cardiovascular system: A systematic review of animal and human studies.
hongbinw222@126.com,Hongbin Wang,Correlated analysis and pathological study on insulin resistance and cardiovascular endocrine hormone in elderly hypertension patients.
lgreen@sstom.ac.uk,L R Green,Programming of endocrine mechanisms of cardiovascular control and growth.
jjdinicol@gmail.com,James J DiNicolantonio,Thiamine and Cardiovascular Disease: A Literature Review.
aniagluba@yahoo.pl,Anna Gluba-Brzózka,Impact of Vitamin D on the Cardiovascular System in Advanced Chronic Kidney Disease (CKD) and Dialysis Patients.
bfranczyk-skora@wp.pl,Beata Franczyk,Impact of Vitamin D on the Cardiovascular System in Advanced Chronic Kidney Disease (CKD) and Dialysis Patients.
olarysz@rmed.pl,Aleksandra Ciałkowska-Rysz,Impact of Vitamin D on the Cardiovascular System in Advanced Chronic Kidney Disease (CKD) and Dialysis Patients.
robert.olszewski@me.com,Robert Olszewski,Impact of Vitamin D on the Cardiovascular System in Advanced Chronic Kidney Disease (CKD) and Dialysis Patients.
jacek.rysz@umed.lodz.pl,Jacek Rysz,Impact of Vitamin D on the Cardiovascular System in Advanced Chronic Kidney Disease (CKD) and Dialysis Patients.
mauriced@post.queensu.ca,Donald H Maurice,Cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase-mediated integration of cGMP and cAMP signaling in cells of the cardiovascular system.
jliao@medicine.bsd.uchicago.edu,James K Liao,Pleiotropic Effects of Statins on the Cardiovascular System.
peter.kistler@baker.edu.au,Peter M Kistler,Cardiovascular effects of caffeinated beverages.
branco@forp.usp.br,Luiz G S Branco,Role of central hydrogen sulfide on ventilatory and cardiovascular responses to hypoxia in spontaneous hypertensive rats.
jason.kovacic@mountsinai.org,Jason C Kovacic,Monocyte and Macrophage Dynamics in the Cardiovascular System: JACC Macrophage in CVD Series (Part 3).
philipp.jud@medunigraz.at,Philipp Jud,Homoarginine/ADMA ratio and homoarginine/SDMA ratio as independent predictors of cardiovascular mortality and cardiovascular events in lower extremity arterial disease.
enels@illinois.edu,Erik R Nelson,From empirical to mechanism-based discovery of clinically useful Selective Estrogen Receptor Modulators (SERMs).
donald.mcdonnell@duke.edu,Donald P McDonnell,From empirical to mechanism-based discovery of clinically useful Selective Estrogen Receptor Modulators (SERMs).
shyukg@ms12.hinet.net,Kou-Gi Shyu,Cellular and molecular effects of mechanical stretch on vascular cells and cardiac myocytes.
kumuda.das2@uthct.edu,Kumuda C Das,Role of Thioredoxin in Age-Related Hypertension.
david.roman@uacj.mx,José Díaz,Modeling the control of the central nervous system over the cardiovascular system using support vector machines.
ajesus@uptag.edu.ve,Jesús Acosta,Modeling the control of the central nervous system over the cardiovascular system using support vector machines.
rafael.gonzalez@uacj.mx,Rafael González,Modeling the control of the central nervous system over the cardiovascular system using support vector machines.
jcota@uacj.mx,Juan Cota,Modeling the control of the central nervous system over the cardiovascular system using support vector machines.
esifuent@uacj.mx,Ernesto Sifuentes,Modeling the control of the central nervous system over the cardiovascular system using support vector machines.
angela@cs.upc.edu,Àngela Nebot,Modeling the control of the central nervous system over the cardiovascular system using support vector machines.
benjamin.goldstein@sunnybrook.ca,Benjamin I Goldstein,Bipolar Disorder and the Vascular System: Mechanisms and New Prevention Opportunities.
sophie.astrof@jefferson.edu,Sophie Astrof,Fibronectin signals through integrin α5β1 to regulate cardiovascular development in a cell type-specific manner.
m.hanson@ucl.ac.uk,M A Hanson,Do we now understand the control of the fetal circulation?
albert.sinusas@yale.edu,Albert J Sinusas,Multimodality cardiovascular molecular imaging: an overview.
azzyj12@163.com,Yu-Jie Zhou,The Impact of Hypoglycemia on the Cardiovascular System: Physiology and Pathophysiology.
peter.stenvinkel@ki.se,Peter Stenvinkel,"Nrf2 in early vascular ageing: Calcification, senescence and therapy."
qu.tian@nih.gov,Qu Tian,Midlife and Late-Life Cardiorespiratory Fitness and Brain Volume Changes in Late Adulthood: Results From the Baltimore Longitudinal Study of Aging.
ellen.g.mcmahon@pharmacia.com,Ellen G McMahon,"Eplerenone, a new selective aldosterone blocker."
meldi@bih.net.ba,Meldijana Omerbegovic,Analysis of heart rate variability and clinical implications.
v.kapil@qmul.ac.uk,V Kapil,Clinical evidence demonstrating the utility of inorganic nitrate in cardiovascular health.
stephan.nekolla@tum.de,Stephan G Nekolla,Cardiovascular preclinical imaging.
jingelfinger@partners.org,Julie R Ingelfinger,Pathogenesis of perinatal programming.
thelma.lovick@bristol.ac.uk,Thelma Lovick,Deep brain stimulation and autonomic control.
374752317@qq.com,Kai Yin,Endothelial-to-mesenchymal transition: A novel therapeutic target for cardiovascular diseases.
ctaguiar@sapo.pt,Carlos Aguiar,"Cardiovascular effects of fingolimod: Relevance, detection and approach."
yvan.devaux@lih.lu,Yvan Devaux,Transcriptome of blood cells as a reservoir of cardiovascular biomarkers.
valery.eskov@gmail.com,V M Eskov,[Neurocomputer identification of order parameters in gerontology].
c.ruhrberg@ucl.ac.uk,Christiana Ruhrberg,Neural crest cells in cardiovascular development.
will.redfern@astrazeneca.com,Will S Redfern,Cardiovascular safety risk assessment for new candidate drugs from functional and pathological data: Conference report.
s.doggrell@xtra.co.nz,Sheila A Doggrell,Urotensin-II and the cardiovascular system--the importance of developing modulators.
georges.lacaud@cruk.manchester.ac.uk,Georges Lacaud,SOXF transcription factors in cardiovascular development.
valerie.kouskoff@cruk.manchester.ac.uk,Valerie Kouskoff,SOXF transcription factors in cardiovascular development.
b.bhattacharya-ghosh@ucl.ac.uk,Benjamin Bhattacharya-Ghosh,An in silico case study of idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy via a multi-scale model of the cardiovascular system.
s.bozkurt@tue.nl,Selim Bozkurt,An in silico case study of idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy via a multi-scale model of the cardiovascular system.
m.c.m.rutten@tue.nl,Marcel C M Rutten,An in silico case study of idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy via a multi-scale model of the cardiovascular system.
f.n.v.d.vosse@tue.nl,Frans N van de Vosse,An in silico case study of idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy via a multi-scale model of the cardiovascular system.
v.diaz@ucl.ac.uk,Vanessa Díaz-Zuccarini,An in silico case study of idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy via a multi-scale model of the cardiovascular system.
russell@medicine.uq.edu.au,Fraser D Russell,Emerging roles of urotensin-II in cardiovascular disease.
sara.menazza@nih.gov,Sara Menazza,The Expanding Complexity of Estrogen Receptor Signaling in the Cardiovascular System.
zanzingerj@aol.com,J Zanzinger,Role of nitric oxide in the neural control of cardiovascular function.
sam@bm.technion.ac.il,Samuel Sideman,Preface: the cellular communications maze.
naomi.visanji@uhnresearch.ca,Naomi P Visanji,Lymphatic vasculature in human dural superior sagittal sinus: Implications for neurodegenerative proteinopathies.
dcenturi@cinvestav.mx,David Centurión,Chronic administration of NaHS and L-Cysteine restores cardiovascular changes induced by high-fat diet in rats.
lfjunq@unb.br,Luiz Fernando Jr Junqueira,Teaching cardiac autonomic function dynamics employing the Valsalva (Valsalva-Weber) maneuver.
afshin.beheshti@nasa.gov,Afshin Beheshti,GeneLab Database Analyses Suggest Long-Term Impact of Space Radiation on the Cardiovascular System by the Activation of FYN Through Reactive Oxygen Species.
john.mcdonald@hamptonu.edu,J Tyson McDonald,GeneLab Database Analyses Suggest Long-Term Impact of Space Radiation on the Cardiovascular System by the Activation of FYN Through Reactive Oxygen Species.
j_miller@lbl.gov,Jack Miller,GeneLab Database Analyses Suggest Long-Term Impact of Space Radiation on the Cardiovascular System by the Activation of FYN Through Reactive Oxygen Species.
pwg2@cumc.columbia.edu,Peter Grabham,GeneLab Database Analyses Suggest Long-Term Impact of Space Radiation on the Cardiovascular System by the Activation of FYN Through Reactive Oxygen Species.
sylvain.v.costes@nasa.gov,Sylvain V Costes,GeneLab Database Analyses Suggest Long-Term Impact of Space Radiation on the Cardiovascular System by the Activation of FYN Through Reactive Oxygen Species.
stephen.fava@um.edu.mt,Stephen Fava,Glucagon-like peptide 1 and the cardiovascular system.
gavin.oudit@ualberta.ca,Gavin Y Oudit,Angiotensin-Converting Enzyme 2 Metabolizes and Partially Inactivates Pyr-Apelin-13 and Apelin-17: Physiological Effects in the Cardiovascular System.
daniela.grimaldi@northwestern.edu,Daniela Grimaldi,Insomnia and cardiovascular autonomic control.
c.taylor@louisiana.edu,Charles E Taylor,Development of an adaptive pulmonary simulator for in vitro analysis of patient populations and patient-specific data.
yyoshio@iwate-u.ac.jp,Yoshio Yamamoto,Time-dependent changes in cardiorespiratory functions of anesthetized rats exposed to sustained hypoxia.
lars.melholt.rasmussen@rsyd.dk,Lars Melholt Rasmussen,Fibulins and their role in cardiovascular biology and disease.
imcgaw@ccmail.nevada.edu,Iain J McGaw,The decapod crustacean circulatory system: a case that is neither open nor closed.
r.sarzani@univpm.it,R Sarzani,"Endocannabinoids, blood pressure and the human heart."
broadleykj@cardiff.ac.uk,Kenneth J Broadley,The vascular effects of trace amines and amphetamines.
avillablanca@ucdavis.edu,A C Villablanca,Heart disease during pregnancy. Which cardiovascular changes are normal or transient?
j.n.sharma@hsc.edu.kw,Jagdish N Sharma,Role of tissue kallikrein-kininogen-kinin pathways in the cardiovascular system.
edoardo.mannucci@unifi.it,E Mannucci,Dypeptidylpeptidase-4 inhibitors and the cardiovascular system: How to manage the fil rouge.
indolfi@unicz.it,Ciro Indolfi,Exosomal miRNAs in Heart Disease.
michael.trenell@ncl.ac.uk,Michael I Trenell,High-intensity interval training: a review of its impact on glucose control and cardiometabolic health.
slipshultz@upa.chob.edu,Steven E Lipshultz,A randomized controlled laboratory study on the long-term effects of methylphenidate on cardiovascular function and structure in rhesus monkeys.
ekozarov@gmail.com,Emil Kozarov,Bacterial invasion of vascular cell types: vascular infectology and atherogenesis.
iellamo@med.uniroma2.it,F Iellamo,Neural control of the cardiovascular system during exercise.
javier.ottaviani@mss.effem.com,Javier I Ottaviani,Recommending flavanols and procyanidins for cardiovascular health: Revisited.
mikael.norman@ki.se,Mikael Norman,Low birth weight and the developing vascular tree: a systematic review.
mkenaan@med.umich.edu,Mohamad Kenaan,Hemodynamic assessment in the contemporary intensive care unit: a review of circulatory monitoring devices.
shahcardiology@yahoo.com,Rahman Shah,Protease-activated receptors in cardiovascular health and diseases.
pdryu@snu.ac.kr,Pan Dong Ryu,Potential Erythropoiesis in the Primo-Vascular System in Heart Failure.
dan.roden@vanderbilt.edu,Dan M Roden,Cardiovascular pharmacogenomics: the future of cardiovascular therapeutics?
cgratziou@med.uoa.gr,Christina Gratziou,"Respiratory, cardiovascular and other physiological consequences of smoking cessation."
csumners@ufl.edu,Colin Sumners,Role of neurons and glia in the CNS actions of the renin-angiotensin system in cardiovascular control.
dariush.mozaffarian@tufts.edu,Dariush Mozaffarian,"Flavonoids, Dairy Foods, and Cardiovascular and Metabolic Health: A Review of Emerging Biologic Pathways."
jean-paul.richalet@avc.aphp.fr,Jean-Paul Richalet,[Altitude and the cardiovascular system].
ozolinst@queensu.ca,Terence R S Ozolinš,"In Utero Exposure to a Cardiac Teratogen Causes Reversible Deficits in Postnatal Cardiovascular Function, But Altered Adaptation to the Burden of Pregnancy."
neshe@doctors.org.uk,N Sriskandan,Imaging of dizziness.
paul.pilowsky@hri.org.au,Paul M Pilowsky,Dynamic changes in the relationship of microglia to cardiovascular neurons in response to increases and decreases in blood pressure.
felix.engel@uk-erlangen.de,Felix B Engel,"Heart Development, Angiogenesis, and Blood-Brain Barrier Function Is Modulated by Adhesion GPCRs."
colin.niaudet@gmail.com,Colin Niaudet,"Heart Development, Angiogenesis, and Blood-Brain Barrier Function Is Modulated by Adhesion GPCRs."
s_doggrell@yahoo.com,Sheila A Doggrell,The therapeutic potential of endothelin-1 receptor antagonists and endothelin-converting enzyme inhibitors on the cardiovascular system.
rohynes@mit.edu,Richard O Hynes,α5 and αv integrins cooperate to regulate vascular smooth muscle and neural crest functions in vivo.
jan.fredrik.bugge@rikshospitalet.no,J F Bugge,Brain death and its implications for management of the potential organ donor.
wendy.peavy@baylorhealth.edu,Wendy C Peavy,Cardiovascular effects of obesity: implications for critical care.
hwaki@juntendo.ac.jp,Hidefumi Waki,Bidirectional cardiovascular responses evoked by microstimulation of the amygdala in rats.
paul.pilowsky@mq.edu.au,Paul M Pilowsky,Neurochemical phenotypes of cardiorespiratory neurons.
j.galema-boers@erasmusmc.nl,Annette M Galema-Boers,Cardiovascular risk in patients with familial hypercholesterolemia using optimal lipid-lowering therapy.
aarnold5@pennstatehealth.psu.edu,Amy C Arnold,The renin-angiotensin system in cardiovascular autonomic control: recent developments and clinical implications.
wimjoyce92@gmail.com,William Joyce,Adenosinergic regulation of the cardiovascular system in the red-eared slider Trachemys scripta.
sun.224@osu.edu,Qinghua Sun,Cardiovascular response to thermoregulatory challenges.
guido.grassi@unimib.it,Guido Grassi,Sympathetic overdrive and cardiovascular risk in the metabolic syndrome.
ppainter@oehha.ca.gov,Page R Painter,Allometric scaling of the maximum metabolic rate of mammals: oxygen transport from the lungs to the heart is a limiting step.
felix.jansen@ukb.uni-bonn.de,Felix Jansen,Exosomes as Diagnostic Biomarkers in Cardiovascular Diseases.
lat@biomed.wustl.edu,L A Taber,Biomechanics of cardiovascular development.
claudio.sartori@chuv.ch,Claudio Sartori,Epigenetics in Cardiovascular Regulation.
giuseppe.genchi@unical.it,Giuseppe Genchi,Mercury Exposure and Heart Diseases.
s.sinicropi@unical.it,Maria Stefania Sinicropi,Mercury Exposure and Heart Diseases.
alessia.carocci@uniba.it,Alessia Carocci,Mercury Exposure and Heart Diseases.
glauria@unical.it,Graziantonio Lauria,Mercury Exposure and Heart Diseases.
alessia.catalano@uniba.it,Alessia Catalano,Mercury Exposure and Heart Diseases.
waird@bidmc.harvard.edu,W C Aird,Discovery of the cardiovascular system: from Galen to William Harvey.
nagatas@po.cnet.ne.jp,T Nagata,Study of the effects of aging on macromolecular synthesis in various organ systems using microscopic radioautography.
p.zalewski@cm.umk.pl,Pawel Zalewski,Cardiovascular and autonomic responses to whole-body cryostimulation in essential hypertension.
claudia.mazovargas@ucd.ie,Claudia Mazo,Transfer learning for classification of cardiovascular tissues in histological images.
frederic.fahey@childrens.harvard.edu,Frederic Fahey,Dose optimization in nuclear medicine.
thorsten.schwerte@uibk.ac.at,Thorsten Schwerte,Cardio-respiratory control during early development in the model animal zebrafish.
luizfverissimo@gmail.com,Luiz Fernando Veríssimo,Treatment with escitalopram modulates cardiovascular function in rats.
vinicius_volpini@hotmail.com,Vinicius Lucca Volpini,Treatment with escitalopram modulates cardiovascular function in rats.
viviane_estrada@hotmail.com,Viviane Batista Estrada,Treatment with escitalopram modulates cardiovascular function in rats.
natikimie@gmail.com,Natália Kimie Matsubara,Treatment with escitalopram modulates cardiovascular function in rats.
mvmgomes@gmail.com,Marcus Vinicius Gomes,Treatment with escitalopram modulates cardiovascular function in rats.
leoresstel@fmrp.usp.br,Leonardo Barbosa Moraes Resstel,Treatment with escitalopram modulates cardiovascular function in rats.
fmdacorr@fmrp.usp.br,Fernando Morgan Aguiar Correa,Treatment with escitalopram modulates cardiovascular function in rats.
pelosigg@gmail.com,Gislaine Garcia Pelosi,Treatment with escitalopram modulates cardiovascular function in rats.
dturnbull@ramboll.com,Duncan Turnbull,Caffeine and cardiovascular health.
cpatters@med.unc.edu,C Patterson,[Current topics in vascular biology: an update for the 21st century].
marianne.thoresen@bristol.ac.uk,Marianne Thoresen,Physiological responses to hypothermia.
rtheobald@atsu.edu,Robert J Jr Theobald,Role of centrally active cardiovascular agents in cognitive disorders.
c.vonschacky@omegametrix.eu,Clemens von Schacky,Omega-3 index and cardiovascular health.
r.testa@inrca.it,Roberto Testa,Inflammageing and metaflammation: The yin and yang of type 2 diabetes.
sacosta@bcm.edu,Sebastián Acosta,Cardiovascular mechanics in the early stages of pulmonary hypertension: a computational study.
dfranco@ujaen.es,Diego Franco,Differential chamber-specific expression and regulation of long non-coding RNAs during cardiac development.
zl3e@virginia.edu,Zhen-qi Liu,Angiotensin II and insulin crosstalk in the cardiovascular system.
spatan@aecom.yu.du,S Patan,"Vasculogenesis and angiogenesis as mechanisms of vascular network formation, growth and remodeling."
robertsv@ohsu.edu,Victoria H J Roberts,Impact of maternal obesity on fetal programming of cardiovascular disease.
juny@frontier.kyoto-u.ac.jp,Jun K Yamashita,ES and iPS cell research for cardiovascular regeneration.
hyalcin@qu.edu.qa,Huseyin C Yalcin,Hemodynamic Studies for Analyzing the Teratogenic Effects of Drugs in the Zebrafish Embryo.
eabrujan@yahoo.com,Emil-Alexandru Brujan,Cardiovascular cavitation.
federica.accornero@osumc.edu,Federica Accornero,Cardiovascular inflammation: RNA takes the lead.
inemonte@unict.it,Ines P Monte,Morpho-functional cardiovascular adaptation in hypertensive patients: two-dimensional speckle tracking echocardiographic study.
lakattae@grc.nia.nih.gov,Edward G Lakatta,Age-associated cardiovascular changes in health: impact on cardiovascular disease in older persons.
areiss@nyuwinthrop.org,Allison B Reiss,Adenosine and the Cardiovascular System.
zjwzzxq@163.com,Ailan Xie,Physiological and pathological impact of AQP1 knockout in mice.
karel.marsal@med.lu.se,Karel Maršál,Physiological adaptation of the growth-restricted fetus.
wanner_c@ukw.de,Christoph Wanner,The heart and vascular system in dialysis.
nancy.j.brown@vanderbilt.edu,Nancy J Brown,Eplerenone: cardiovascular protection.
vcoskun@uci.edu,Volkan Coskun,Studying the pathophysiologic connection between cardiovascular and nervous systems using stem cells.
j.h.coote@bham.ac.uk,John H Coote,Landmarks in understanding the central nervous control of the cardiovascular system.
jeffrey.blumberg@tufts.edu,Jeffrey B Blumberg,Concord Grape Juice Polyphenols and Cardiovascular Risk Factors: Dose-Response Relationships.
jvita@bu.edu,Joseph A Vita,Concord Grape Juice Polyphenols and Cardiovascular Risk Factors: Dose-Response Relationships.
oliver.chen@tufts.edu,C-Y Oliver Chen,Concord Grape Juice Polyphenols and Cardiovascular Risk Factors: Dose-Response Relationships.
salvatore.chirumbolo@univr.it,Salvatore Chirumbolo,Role of quercetin in vascular physiology.
elena.kaschina@charite.de,Elena Kaschina,AT2 receptors in cardiovascular and renal diseases.
p.namsolleck@maastrichtuniversity.nl,Pawel Namsolleck,AT2 receptors in cardiovascular and renal diseases.
t.unger@maastrichtuniversity.nl,Thomas Unger,AT2 receptors in cardiovascular and renal diseases.
jbutler4@umc.edu,Javed Butler,Cardiovascular Aging and Heart Failure: JACC Review Topic of the Week.
rosemary.horne@monash.edu,Rosemary S C Horne,Cardiovascular autonomic dysfunction in sudden infant death syndrome.
m.ponticos@ucl.ac.uk,Markella Ponticos,Connective tissue growth factor (CCN2) in blood vessels.
daiber@uni-mainz.de,Andreas Daiber,Redox regulation of cardiovascular inflammation - Immunomodulatory function of mitochondrial and Nox-derived reactive oxygen and nitrogen species.
frank.kelly@kcl.ac.uk,Frank J Kelly,Role of oxidative stress in cardiovascular disease outcomes following exposure to ambient air pollution.
plm.kerkhof@vumc.nl,Peter L M Kerkhof,Sex-Specific Cardiovascular Comorbidities with Associations in Dermatologic and Rheumatic Disorders.
fin.biering-soerensen@regionh.dk,Fin Biering-Sørensen,Alterations in cardiac autonomic control in spinal cord injury.
tor.biering@gmail.com,Tor Biering-Sørensen,Alterations in cardiac autonomic control in spinal cord injury.
puth_liunan@outlook.com,Nan Liu,Alterations in cardiac autonomic control in spinal cord injury.
malmqvist.lasse@gmail.com,Lasse Malmqvist,Alterations in cardiac autonomic control in spinal cord injury.
jm.wecht@va.gov,Jill Maria Wecht,Alterations in cardiac autonomic control in spinal cord injury.
krassioukov@icord.org,Andrei Krassioukov,Alterations in cardiac autonomic control in spinal cord injury.
p.carrive@unsw.du.au,Pascal Carrive,Orexin and Central Modulation of Cardiovascular and Respiratory Function.
george.osol@med.uvm.edu,George Osol,Plasticity of the Maternal Vasculature During Pregnancy.
daniela.zizioli@unibs.it,Daniela Zizioli,"Knock-down of pantothenate kinase 2 severely affects the development of the nervous and vascular system in zebrafish, providing new insights into PKAN disease."
dario.finazzi@unibs.it,Dario Finazzi,"Knock-down of pantothenate kinase 2 severely affects the development of the nervous and vascular system in zebrafish, providing new insights into PKAN disease."
schroeder@vrc.uni-frankfurt.de,Katrin Schröder,Organizers and activators: Cytosolic Nox proteins impacting on vascular function.
rellis-hutchings@dow.com,Robert G Ellis-Hutchings,Embryonic vascular disruption adverse outcomes: Linking high throughput signaling signatures with functional consequences.
lalekoldas@gmail.com,Z Lale Koldaş,[What is aging and cardiovascular aging?].
justin.trombold@utsouthwestern.edu,Joel D Trinity,Impact of polyphenol antioxidants on cycling performance and cardiovascular function.
matthew.pahnke@pepsico.com,Matthew D Pahnke,Impact of polyphenol antioxidants on cycling performance and cardiovascular function.
coyle@austin.utexas.edu,Edward F Coyle,Impact of polyphenol antioxidants on cycling performance and cardiovascular function.
mtouma@mednet.ucla.edu,Marlin Touma,Fetal Mouse Cardiovascular Imaging Using a High-frequency Ultrasound (30/45MHZ) System.
iain.dykes@bristol.ac.uk,Iain M Dykes,HIC2 regulates isoform switching during maturation of the cardiovascular system.
raouf_khalil@hms.harvard.edu,Raouf A Khalil,Cooperative Role of Mineralocorticoid Receptor and Caveolin-1 in Regulating the Vascular Response to Low Nitric Oxide-High Angiotensin II-Induced Cardiovascular Injury.
r.pandit@umcutrecht.nl,R Pandit,Role of leptin in energy expenditure: the hypothalamic perspective.
906463752@qq.com,Fang-Fang Liu,Network-based transcriptomic analysis reveals novel melatonin-sensitive genes in cardiovascular system.
oupon@t-online.de,Olaf Pongs,TRPM4 channels in the cardiovascular system.
roberto.cangemi@uniroma1.it,Roberto Cangemi,Gender related differences in treatment and response to statins in primary and secondary cardiovascular prevention: The never-ending debate.
lixr6@mail.sysu.edu.cn,Xuri Li,Platelet-derived growth factor-C and -D in the cardiovascular system and diseases.
jay.hove.@uc.edu,Jay R Hove,Quantifying cardiovascular flow dynamics during early development.
crisbus@usp.br,C Busnardo,NMDA and non-NMDA glutamate receptors in the paraventricular nucleus of the hypothalamus modulate different stages of hemorrhage-evoked cardiovascular responses in rats.
c.mathias@ic.ac.uk,Christopher J Mathias,To stand on one's own legs.
otuki@ufpr.br,Michel Fleith Otuki,Aliskiren: Preclinical evidence for the treatment of hyperproliferative skin disorders.
lenus.kloosterbore@organon.com,Helenius J Kloosterboer,Tissue-selectivity: the mechanism of action of tibolone.
mitchell@svm.vetmed.wisc.edu,Gordon S Mitchell,Therapeutic potential of intermittent hypoxia: a matter of dose.
drucker@lunenfeld.ca,Daniel J Drucker,The Cardiovascular Biology of Glucagon-like Peptide-1.
mta1@olemiss.edu,Michael T Allen,Integrative commentary: implications of blunted reactivity.
massimo.santoro@unito.it,Massimo M Santoro,Real-time quantification of subcellular H(2)O(2) and glutathione redox potential in living cardiovascular tissues.
antonio.cittadini@unina.it,Antonio Cittadini,"Klinefelter syndrome, cardiovascular system, and thromboembolic disease: review of literature and clinical perspectives."
hughson@uwaterloo.ca,Richard L Hughson,Autonomic responses to exercise: deconditioning/inactivity.
colinyoung@gwu.edu,Colin N Young,A synthetic luciferin improves in vivo bioluminescence imaging of gene expression in cardiovascular brain regions.
judith.brouillette@icm-mhi.org,Judith Brouillette,A Practical Approach to Avoiding Cardiovascular Adverse Effects of Psychoactive Medications.
stanley.nattel@icm-mhi.org,Stanley Nattel,A Practical Approach to Avoiding Cardiovascular Adverse Effects of Psychoactive Medications.
kunes@biomed.cas.cz,J Kuneš,The role of food intake regulating peptides in cardiovascular regulation.
stephen.nicholls@sahmri.com,Stephen J Nicholls,Selective BET Protein Inhibition with Apabetalone and Cardiovascular Events: A Pooled Analysis of Trials in Patients with Coronary Artery Disease.
stjenalo@uci.edu,Stephanie C Tjen-A-Looi,Modulation of Neurally Mediated Vasodepression and Bradycardia by Electroacupuncture through Opioids in Nucleus Tractus Solitarius.
macbeh@amu.edu.pl,Maciej Behnke,Successful performance and cardiovascular markers of challenge and threat: A meta-analysis.
babette@med.cornell.edu,Babettte B Weksler,Prostanoids and NSAIDs in cardiovascular biology and disease.
tanus@fmrp.usp.br,Jose E Tanus-Santos,Endothelial nitric oxide synthase: From biochemistry and gene structure to clinical implications of NOS3 polymorphisms.
renatofilogonio@gmail.com,Renato Filogonio,"Nitrergic cardiovascular regulation in the African lungfish, Protopterus aethiopicus."
jimena_giudice@med.unc.edu,Jimena Giudice,Muscle as a paracrine and endocrine organ.
jmt3x@med.unc.edu,Joan M Taylor,Muscle as a paracrine and endocrine organ.
staci.leisman@mssm.edu,Staci Leisman,Use of an iPad App to simulate pressure-volume loops and cardiovascular physiology.
john.kingdom@sinaihealthsystem.ca,John C Kingdom,Mechanisms and Clinical Significance of Endothelial Dysfunction in High-Risk Pregnancies.
rugonyis@ohsu.edu,Sandra Rugonyi,Influence of blood flow on cardiac development.
dechampj@physio.umontreal.ca,J de Champlain,Do most antihypertensive agents have a sympatholytic action?
macampinho@ualg.pt,Marco A Campinho,Ioxynil and diethylstilbestrol disrupt vascular and heart development in zebrafish.
cg.frmr@gmail.com,C G Farmer,On the evolution of arterial vascular patterns of tetrapods.
qinz@uthscsa.edu,Zhenyu Qin,Soluble elastin peptides in cardiovascular homeostasis: Foe or ally.
snoujaim@usf.health.edu,Sami F Noujaim,Allometric scaling of electrical excitation and propagation in the mammalian heart.
jmneutel@aol.com,J M Neutel,Effect of the renin--angiotensin system on the vessel wall: using ACE inhibition to improve endothelial function.
lanesroberto@gmail.com,Roberto Lanes,Cardiovascular Risk in Growth Hormone Deficiency: Beneficial Effects of Growth Hormone Replacement Therapy.
dtrojan@fbtv-treviso.org,Diletta Trojan,Contamination profile in allografts retrieved from multitissue donors: longitudinal analysis.
richard.lawson@man.ac.uk,R S Lawson,Application of mathematical methods in dynamic nuclear medicine studies.
enrico.fileccia@studio.unibo.it,E Fileccia,Absent cardiac and muscle sympathetic nerve activities involvement in Ross syndrome: A follow-up study.
junwang@ibt.tamhsc.edu,Jun Wang,SUMO conjugation and cardiovascular development.
mbkiec@gmail.com,Beata Kieć-Wilk,[Cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in the course of diabetes - the review of actual knowledge.].
j.gastol@yahoo.pl,Joanna Gastoł,[Cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in the course of diabetes - the review of actual knowledge.].
lpawlinski@gmail.com,Łukasz Pawliński,[Cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in the course of diabetes - the review of actual knowledge.].
jockenhoevel@ame.rwth-aachen.de,Stefan Jockenhoevel,Bioengineered vascular constructs as living models for in vitro cardiovascular research.
emilpop@aol.com,E Pop,"Cannabinoids, endogenous ligands and synthetic analogs."
sjlee@postech.ac.kr,Sang Joon Lee,Pristine graphene induces cardiovascular defects in zebrafish (Danio rerio) embryogenesis.
roberta.budriesi@unibo.it,Roberta Budriesi,"4-Imidazo[2,1-b]thiazole-1,4-DHPs and neuroprotection: preliminary study in hits searching."
matthew.zahner@pfizer.com,Matthew R Zahner,Neurophysiological assessment of sympathetic cardiovascular activity after loss of postganglionic neurons in the anesthetized rat.
justyna.szostak@pmi.com,Justyna Szostak,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
bjorn.titz@pmi.com,Bjoern Titz,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
wk.schlage@t-online.de,Walter K Schlage,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
emmanuel.guedj@pmi.com,Emmanuel Guedj,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
alain.sewer@pmi.com,Alain Sewer,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
blaine.phillips@pmi.com,Blaine Phillips,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
patrice.leroy@pmi.com,Patrice Leroy,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
a.buettner@histovia.com,Ansgar Buettner,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
laurent.neau@pmi.com,Laurent Neau,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
keyur.trivedi@pmi.com,Keyur Trivedi,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
florian.martin@pmi.com,Florian Martin,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
nikolai.ivanov@pmi.com,Nikolai V Ivanov,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
patrick.vanscheeuwijck@pmi.com,Patrick Vanscheeuwijck,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
manuel.peitsch@pmi.com,Manuel C Peitsch,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
julia.hoeng@pmi.com,Julia Hoeng,"Structural, functional, and molecular impact on the cardiovascular system in ApoE(-/-) mice exposed to aerosol from candidate modified risk tobacco products, Carbon Heated Tobacco Product 1.2 and Tobacco Heating System 2.2, compared with cigarette smoke."
louisjgooren@gmail.com,Louis J Gooren,Cardiovascular disease in transsexual persons treated with cross-sex hormones: reversal of the traditional sex difference in cardiovascular disease pattern.
aengler@ucsd.edu,Adam J Engler,Mechanical influences on cardiovascular differentiation and disease modeling.
gullace.be@ospedale.lecco.it,Giuseppe Gullace,[Quality management in cardiovascular echography].
gunnel.andersson@fysiologi.gu.se,B Folkow,Perspectives on the integrative functions of the 'sympatho-adrenomedullary system'.
cbondonno@meddent.uwa.edu.au,Catherine P Bondonno,Dietary flavonoids and nitrate: effects on nitric oxide and vascular function.
klionsky@umich.edu,Daniel J Klionsky,Molecular mechanisms of autophagy in the cardiovascular system.
m.j.willemink@gmail.com,Martin J Willemink,Cardiac CT Imaging of Plaque Vulnerability: Hype or Hope?
timleiner@gmail.com,Tim Leiner,Cardiac CT Imaging of Plaque Vulnerability: Hype or Hope?
p.maurovich-horvat@cirg.hu,Pál Maurovich-Horvat,Cardiac CT Imaging of Plaque Vulnerability: Hype or Hope?
djp@u.washington.edu,David J Pierson,The physiology of dinosaurs: circulatory and respiratory function in the largest animals ever to walk the earth.
rre@ochsner.org,R N Re,The clinical implication of tissue renin angiotensin systems.
ebelindechanteme@augusta.edu,Eric J Belin de Chantemèle,Sex Differences in Leptin Control of Cardiovascular Function in Health and Metabolic Diseases.
seguchi@temple.edu,Steven J Forrester,"Epidermal Growth Factor Receptor Transactivation: Mechanisms, Pathophysiology, and Potential Therapies in the Cardiovascular System."
vermasu@smh.ca,Subodh Verma,Potential Mechanisms of Sodium-Glucose Co-Transporter 2 Inhibitor-Related Cardiovascular Benefits.
scott.earley@colostate.edu,Scott Earley,TRPA1 channels in the vasculature.
l.fiedler@ucl.ac.uk,Lorna R Fiedler,Rac1 regulates cardiovascular development and postnatal function of endothelium.
sahebkara@mums.ac.ir,Amirhossein Sahebkar,Regulation of cardiac stem cells by microRNAs: State-of-the-art.
fizyolog@gmail.com,M Saygin,The impact of high fructose on cardiovascular system: Role of α-lipoic acid.
mpugsle2@its.jnj.com,Michael K Pugsley,Safety pharmacology in 2014: new focus on non-cardiac methods and models.
sahar.naderi@kp.org,Sahar Naderi,Cannabis and Cardiovascular Disease.
barman@msu.edu,Susan M Barman,What can we learn about neural control of the cardiovascular system by studying rhythms in sympathetic nerve activity?
palatini@unipd.it,Paolo Palatini,"Elevated heart rate: a ""new"" cardiovascular risk factor?"
donald@netvision.net.il,Donald S Silverberg,The role of erythropoiesis stimulating agents and intravenous (IV) iron in the cardio renal anemia syndrome.
ngo@hia.rwth-aachen.de,Chuong Ngo,An object-oriented computational model to study cardiopulmonary hemodynamic interactions in humans.
sdas@mgh.harvard.edu,Saumya Das,"Y RNAs: Biogenesis, Function and Implications for the Cardiovascular System."
medins@tsu.tula.ru,A A Khadartsev,Experimental Study of Statistical Stability of Cardiointerval Samples.
bertrand.cariou@univ-nantes.fr,B Cariou,Pleiotropic effects of insulin and GLP-1 receptor agonists: Potential benefits of the association.
aally@mailbox.une.edu,A Ally,Cardiovascular effects of central administration of clonidine in conscious cats.
julie.goodwin@yale.edu,Julie E Goodwin,Glucocorticoids and the Cardiovascular System.
afm@otenet.gr,Andreas F Mavrogenis,Cardiovascular ultrasonography detection of embolic sources in trauma.
stephanie.yiallourou@monash.edu,Stephanie R Yiallourou,Effects of intrauterine growth restriction on sleep and the cardiovascular system: The use of melatonin as a potential therapy?
francesco.ramirez@mssm.edu,Francesco Ramirez,"Extracellular Determinants of Arterial Morphogenesis, Growth, and Homeostasis."
lgooren@inter.nl.net,L J Gooren,Endocrine aspects of ageing in the male.
ludger.grote@lungall.gu.se,L Grote,[Invasive and noninvasive techniques for analysis of cardiovascular effects of sleep apnea].
gaetano.thiene@unipd.it,Gaetano Thiene,Cardiovascular medicine in Morgagni's De sedibus: dawn of cardiovascular pathology.
jfrisbie@comcast.net,J H Frisbie,Correction of orthostatic hypotension by respiratory effort.
karen.sliwa-hahnle@uct.ac.za,Karen Sliwa,Role of pregnancy hormones and hormonal interaction on the maternal cardiovascular system: a literature review.
jason.s.cordes@pfizer.com,Jason S Cordes,Validation and utility of the PhysioTel™ Digital M11 telemetry implant for cardiovascular data evaluation in cynomolgus monkeys and Beagle dogs.
jmmoon@jnu.ac.kr,Byeong Jo Chun,Cardiovascular Effects and Fatality May Differ According to the Formulation of Glyphosate Salt Herbicide.
jdlorenc@geisinger.edu,Jason D Lorenc,Inhalant abuse in the pediatric population: a persistent challenge.
gaoxq@mail.uc.edu,Xiaoqian Gao,Impact of bisphenol a on the cardiovascular system - epidemiological and experimental evidence and molecular mechanisms.
wanghs@uc.edu,Hong-Sheng Wang,Impact of bisphenol a on the cardiovascular system - epidemiological and experimental evidence and molecular mechanisms.
neidlin@ame.rwth-aachen.de,Michael Neidlin,Hemodynamic analysis of outflow grafting positions of a ventricular assist device using closed-loop multiscale CFD simulations: Preliminary results.
kirrane.ellen@epa.gov,E F Kirrane,A systematic review of cardiovascular responses associated with ambient black carbon and fine particulate matter.
pamodesti@unifi.it,Pietro Amedeo Modesti,Seasonal blood pressure variation: implications for cardiovascular risk stratification.
gebreitw@syr.edu,Gerda E Breitwieser,G protein-coupled receptor oligomerization: implications for G protein activation and cell signaling.
rwhite@mail.mcg.edu,Richard E White,Estrogen and vascular function.
aally@mail-box.une.edu,A Ally,Ventrolateral medullary control of cardiovascular activity during muscle contraction.
myimam@unigen.net,Mesfin Yimam,"Effect of a botanical composition, UP446, on respiratory, cardiovascular and central nervous systems in beagle dogs and rats."
rodjean@comcast.net,Rodney H Adkins,Research and interpretation perspectives on aging related physical morbidity with spinal cord injury and brief review of systems.
robynteply@creighton.edu,Robyn M Teply,Treatment of Depression in Patients with Concomitant Cardiac Disease.
ccypang@interchange.ubc.ca,C C Pang,Autonomic control of the venous system in health and disease: effects of drugs.
a.j.moyes@qmul.ac.uk,Amie J Moyes,C-type Natriuretic Peptide: A Multifaceted Paracrine Regulator in the Heart and Vasculature.
a.j.hobbs@qmul.ac.uk,Adrian J Hobbs,C-type Natriuretic Peptide: A Multifaceted Paracrine Regulator in the Heart and Vasculature.
afink2@uic.edu,Anne M Fink,Autonomic regulation during sleep and wakefulness: a review with implications for defining the pathophysiology of neurological disorders.
amoskor@post.tau.ac.il,Amos D Korczyn,Vascular contribution to dementia in Parkinson's disease.
yegu2003cn@163.com,Ye Gu,Acute Beneficial Effects of Sodium Nitroprusside in a Rabbit Model of Massive Pulmonary Embolism Associated with Circulatory Shock.
marinos.kosmopoulos@outlook.com,M Kosmopoulos,The complex crosstalk between inflammatory cytokines and ventricular arrhythmias.
jsilva@fm.ul.pt,J Martins e Silva,Leonardo da Vinci and the first hemodynamic observations.
tkim@isisph.com,Tae-Won Kim,"Antisense oligonucleotides on neurobehavior, respiratory, and cardiovascular function, and hERG channel current studies."
asirvatham.samuel@mayo.edu,Samuel J Asirvatham,Innervation of the heart: An invisible grid within a black box.
annie_ginty@baylor.edu,Annie T Ginty,Cardiovascular and autonomic reactivity to psychological stress: Neurophysiological substrates and links to cardiovascular disease.
rwhite@mtech.edu,Ronald J White,A note regarding the mathematical treatment of a class of steady-state compartmental models of the circulation.
jean-michel.guillon@sanofi-aventis.com,J-M Guillon,[Place and role of safety pharmacology in drug development].
mebates@rutgers.edu,Marsha E Bates,A computational physiology approach to personalized treatment models: the beneficial effects of slow breathing on the human cardiovascular system.
kmlim@kumoh.ac.kr,Ki Moo Lim,Computational analysis of the effect of mitral and aortic regurgitation on the function of ventricular assist devices using 3D cardiac electromechanical model.
bert.uchino@psych.utah.edu,Bert N Uchino,Social support and health: a review of physiological processes potentially underlying links to disease outcomes.
jere.mitchell@utsouthwestern.edu,Jere H Mitchell,Abnormal cardiovascular response to exercise in hypertension: contribution of neural factors.
alessandro.silvani3@unibo.it,Alessandro Silvani,The link between narcolepsy and autonomic cardiovascular dysfunction: a translational perspective.
jay.hove@uc.edu,Jay R Hove,In vivo biofluid dynamic imaging in the developing zebrafish.
lboyer@mit.edu,Laurie A Boyer,Lncing epigenetic control of transcription to cardiovascular development and disease.
alberto.porta@unimi.it,Alberto Porta,Nonlinear effects of respiration on the crosstalk between cardiovascular and cerebrovascular control systems.
howard.weintraub@nyumc.org,Howard S Weintraub,Management of Hypogonadism in Cardiovascular Patients: What Are the Implications of Testosterone Therapy on Cardiovascular Morbidity?
frussell@usc.edu.au,Fraser D Russell,Urotensin II in cardiovascular regulation.
pamelacarpes@unipampa.edu.br,Pâmela B Mello-Carpes,Observing and understanding arterial and venous circulation differences in a physiology laboratory activity.
plibby@rics.bwh.harvard.edu,Peter Libby,Vascular biology of atherosclerosis: overview and state of the art.
dpucciarelli@bsu.edu,Deanna L Pucciarelli,Cocoa and heart health: a historical review of the science.
cmendivi@uniandes.edu.co,Carlos O Mendivil,Neuropad for the detection of cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in patients with type 2 diabetes.
wkattah@uniandes.edu.co,William Kattah,Neuropad for the detection of cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in patients with type 2 diabetes.
arturo.orduz@fsfb.org.co,Arturo Orduz,Neuropad for the detection of cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in patients with type 2 diabetes.
claudia.tique@fsfb.org.co,Claudia Tique,Neuropad for the detection of cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in patients with type 2 diabetes.
jl.cardenas3230@uniandes.edu.co,José L Cárdenas,Neuropad for the detection of cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in patients with type 2 diabetes.
je.patino841@uniandes.edu.co,Jorge E Patiño,Neuropad for the detection of cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy in patients with type 2 diabetes.
tzhao@bu.edu,Ting C Zhao,Glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) and protective effects in cardiovascular disease: a new therapeutic approach for myocardial protection.
ikobayashi@se.kanazawa-u.ac.jp,Isao Kobayashi,Dual role of Jam3b in early hematopoietic and vascular development.
lubos.molcan@uniba.sk,Lubos Molcan,Dim light at night attenuates circadian rhythms in the cardiovascular system and suppresses melatonin in rats.
kwangk@gilhospital.com,Kwang Kon Koh,Inflammatory and metabolic mechanisms underlying the calcific aortic valve disease.
mmendelsohn@lifespan.org,Michael E Mendelsohn,Genomic and nongenomic effects of estrogen in the vasculature.
tiziana.crepaldi@unito.it,Tiziana Crepaldi,Cellular and molecular mechanisms of HGF/Met in the cardiovascular system.
ccmei@mit.edu,C C Mei,Fluid mechanics of Windkessel effect.
yoshinobu_kiso@suntory.co.jp,Yoshinobu Kiso,Pharmacology in health foods: effects of arachidonic acid and docosahexaenoic acid on the age-related decline in brain and cardiovascular system function.
tadkrzem@ka.onet.pl,T F Krzeminski,Crataegus special extract WS 1442: up-to-date review of experimental and clinical experiences.
valleyqq@swu.edu.cn,Juan Yang,"Interdependent self-construal, social evaluative threat and subjective, cardiovascular and neuroendocrine stress response in Chinese."
grin_aa@mail.ru,A A Grinevich,Role of additive stochastic modulation of the heart activity in the formation of 0.1-Hz blood flow oscillations in the human cardiovascular system.
dskimmerly@dal.ca,Derek S Kimmerly,A review of human neuroimaging investigations involved with central autonomic regulation of baroreflex-mediated cardiovascular control.
larry.c.gilstrap@uth.tmc.edu,L C 3rd Gilstrap,Effects of pregnancy on specific diseases.
thomas.zimmer@mti.uni-jena.de,Thomas Zimmer,Effects of tetrodotoxin on the mammalian cardiovascular system.
jussher@ualberta.ca,John R Ussher,Glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor mediated control of cardiac energy metabolism.
leverj@health.missouri.edu,John R Lever,"PET and SPECT imaging of the opioid system: receptors, radioligands and avenues for drug discovery and development."
p.m.dunn@bristol.ac.uk,P M Dunn,Galen (AD 129-200) of Pergamun: anatomist and experimental physiologist.
gencs@research.ge.com,Sahika Genc,Prediction of mean arterial blood pressure with linear stochastic models.
burnsbob@uams.edu,E Robert Burns,"Functional anatomy of the cardiovascular system: professional development for PreK-3 teachers using a ""train and equip"" method results in learning opportunities for students."
sebastien.debournonville@kuleuven.be,Sébastien de Bournonville,Parameter estimation in a minimal model of cardio-pulmonary interactions.
a.pironet@alumni.ulg.ac.be,Antoine Pironet,Parameter estimation in a minimal model of cardio-pulmonary interactions.
chris.pretty@canterbury.ac.nz,Chris Pretty,Parameter estimation in a minimal model of cardio-pulmonary interactions.
cattuong.ndc@gmail.com,Aurelie Nguyen Dinh Cat,Mitochondrial oxidative stress in obesity: role of the mineralocorticoid receptor.
m.gilbey@ucl.ac.uk,Michael P Gilbey,Sympathetic rhythms and nervous integration.
efolkert@ualberta.ca,Erik J Folkerts,Cardio-respirometry disruption in zebrafish (Danio rerio) embryos exposed to hydraulic fracturing flowback and produced water.
victoria.antemann@charite.de,Victoria Antemann,Octopaminergic innervation and a neurohaemal release site in the antennal heart of the locust Schistocerca gregaria.
werner.geldenhuys@hsc.wvu.edu,Werner J Geldenhuys,Exploring Adenosine Receptor Ligands: Potential Role in the Treatment of Cardiovascular Diseases.
ahanif@hsc.wvu.edu,Ahmad Hanif,Exploring Adenosine Receptor Ligands: Potential Role in the Treatment of Cardiovascular Diseases.
jyun@neomed.edu,June Yun,Exploring Adenosine Receptor Ligands: Potential Role in the Treatment of Cardiovascular Diseases.
mnayeem@hsc.wvu.edu,Mohammed A Nayeem,Exploring Adenosine Receptor Ligands: Potential Role in the Treatment of Cardiovascular Diseases.
martin.schultz@utas.edu.au,Martin G Schultz,Submaximal exercise blood pressure and cardiovascular structure in adolescence.
roberto.manfredini@unife.it,Roberto Manfredini,"Daylight saving time, circadian rhythms, and cardiovascular health."
gonzalo.m@virgin.net,G Moscoso,The biology of foetal development and injury.
antonio.fernandez@ulpgc.es,A Fernández,Verminous Arteritis Due to Crassicauda sp. in Cuvier's Beaked Whales (Ziphius Cavirostris).
a.t.ginty@bham.ac.uk,Annie T Ginty,Neuroendocrine and cardiovascular reactions to acute psychological stress are attenuated in smokers.
to.kentung@gmail.com,Kenneth H Tung,Contrasting cardiovascular properties of the µ-opioid agonists morphine and methadone in the rat.
jamesaa@unimelb.edu.au,James A Angus,Contrasting cardiovascular properties of the µ-opioid agonists morphine and methadone in the rat.
cewright@unimelb.edu.au,Christine E Wright,Contrasting cardiovascular properties of the µ-opioid agonists morphine and methadone in the rat.
snoori@chla.usc.edu,Shahab Noori,Evidence-based versus pathophysiology-based approach to diagnosis and treatment of neonatal cardiovascular compromise.
christian.seiler@insel.ch,Stefano F Rimoldi,Patent Foramen Ovale Closure in Obstructive Sleep Apnea Improves Blood Pressure and Cardiovascular Function.
shuchien@ucsd.edu,Shu Chien,"Piezo1, a mechanically activated ion channel, is required for vascular development in mice."
jpwalsh@iu.edu,James P Walsh,Testosterone therapy and cardiovascular risk.
skerrigan@rcsi.ie,Steven W Kerrigan,Dysregulation of the endothelium following Staphylococcus aureus infection.
wiebke.herzog@uni-muenster.de,Wiebke Herzog,Development of the brain vasculature and the blood-brain barrier in zebrafish.
terrence.forrester@uwimona.edu.jm,Terrence E Forrester,Impaired cardiovascular structure and function in adult survivors of severe acute malnutrition.
tal.tamara@epa.gov,Tamara Tal,Screening for angiogenic inhibitors in zebrafish to evaluate a predictive model for developmental vascular toxicity.
andrew.miller3@nih.gov,Andrew C Miller,A systematic review and pooled analysis of CPR-associated cardiovascular and thoracic injuries.
olasb@biol.uni.lodz.pl,Beata Olas,Hydrogen sulfide in hemostasis: friend or foe?
jcaudrelier@toh.on.ca,J-M Caudrelier,Role of hypofractionated radiotherapy in breast locoregional radiation.
cdemey@t-online.de,C de Mey,alpha(1)-blockers for BPH: are there differences?
chakrabk@etsu.edu,Kanishka Chakraborty,Cardiovascular Toxicity and Management of Targeted Cancer Therapy.
christopher.breuer@nationwidechildrens.org,Christopher Breuer,Cardiovascular Tissue Engineering: Preclinical Validation to Bedside Application.
patriciafiorino@mackenzie.br,P Fiorino,Exposure to high-fat diet since post-weaning induces cardiometabolic damage in adult rats.
shingorilla2@gmail.com,S Hatakeyama,Post-transplant renal function and cardiovascular events are closely associated with the aortic calcification index in renal transplant recipients.
hancy17@wku.ac.kr,Chang Yeob Han,Update on FXR Biology: Promising Therapeutic Target?
m.j.white@bham.ac.uk,Michael J White,Muscle afferents and cardiorespiratory control: the Birmingham connection.
zashraf@jmi.ac.in,Mohammad Zahid Ashraf,Involvement of Epigenetic Control and Non-coding RNAs in Cardiovascular System.
bomzon@tx.technion.ac.il,A Bomzon,The effect of bile duct manipulation on cardiovascular responsiveness: in vivo studies.
zhuhui@csu.edu.cn,Hui Zhu,Effects of real and simulated weightlessness on the cardiac and peripheral vascular functions of humans: A review.
hqwang2011@126.com,Hanqing Wang,Effects of real and simulated weightlessness on the cardiac and peripheral vascular functions of humans: A review.
liuzq@csu.edu.cn,Zhiqiang Liu,Effects of real and simulated weightlessness on the cardiac and peripheral vascular functions of humans: A review.
rvargas3200@hotmail.com,Rafael Vargas,Cardiac and somatic parameters in zebrafish: tools for the evaluation of cardiovascular function.
xiaoming.jia@bcm.edu,Xiaoming Jia,SGLT2 Inhibitors and Cardiovascular Outcomes: Current Perspectives and Future Potentials.
eszczepanska@wum.edu.pl,E Szczepanska-Sadowska,Role of neuropeptides in central control of cardiovascular responses to stress.
cathy.mullooly@joslin.harvard.edu,Cathy Mullooly,Cardiovascular fitness and type 2 diabetes.
p.r.china.qak@bjut.edu.cn,Aike Qiao,[Research on the cardiovascular function evaluation system based on noninvasive detection indices].
arashkh@uci.edu,Arash Kheradvar,Diagnostic and prognostic significance of cardiovascular vortex formation.
fscheer@bwh.harvard.edu,Frank A J L Scheer,"Impact of mental stress, the circadian system and their interaction on human cardiovascular function."
marina.ballyzek@mail.ru,P A Ignateva,"[Age characteristics of the cardiovascular system, depending on the thyroid function in type 2 diabetes mellitus]."
y_zhang@zju.edu.cn,Yu Zhang,Characterization of acrylamide-induced oxidative stress and cardiovascular toxicity in zebrafish embryos.
ffuchs@hcpa.ufrgs.br,Flávio Danni Fuchs,The role of angiotensin receptor blockers in the prevention of cardiovascular and renal disease: time for reassessment?
amra@med.mui.ac.ir,Babak Amra,Nocturnal heart rate variation in diabetic and non-diabetic patients with sleep apnea syndrome.
behjati@med.mui.ac.ir,Mohaddeseh Behjati,Nocturnal heart rate variation in diabetic and non-diabetic patients with sleep apnea syndrome.
thomas.penzel@charite.de,Thomas Penzel,Nocturnal heart rate variation in diabetic and non-diabetic patients with sleep apnea syndrome.
ingo.fietze@charite.de,Ingo Fietze,Nocturnal heart rate variation in diabetic and non-diabetic patients with sleep apnea syndrome.
cristoph.schoeble@charite.de,Christoph Schoebel,Nocturnal heart rate variation in diabetic and non-diabetic patients with sleep apnea syndrome.
thomas.jax@profil-research.de,Thomas Jax,Treatment of patients with diabetes with GLP-1 analogues or DPP-4- inhibitors: a hot topic for cardiologists?
ytkim@gatech.edu,YongTae Kim,Microengineered vascular systems for drug development.
brian.black@ucsf.edu,Brian L Black,Cardiovascular development and survival require Mef2c function in the myocardial but not the endothelial lineage.
cristina.ottaviani@uniroma1.it,Cristina Ottaviani,A meta-analysis of non-invasive brain stimulation and autonomic functioning: Implications for brain-heart pathways to cardiovascular disease.
mauroisoldi@hotmail.com,Mauro César Isoldi,Genomic and rapid effects of aldosterone: what we know and do not know thus far.
brent.myers@uc.edu,Brent Myers,Corticolimbic regulation of cardiovascular responses to stress.
baldwin@wista.wistar.upenn.edu,H S Baldwin,Early embryonic vascular development.
christopher.chan@uhn.on.ca,Christopher T Chan,Cardiovascular effects of frequent intensive hemodialysis.
krzysztof.filipiak@amwaw.edu.pl,K J Filipiak,[Sulphonylurea derivatives and the cardiovascular system].
endo@med.unc.edu,David R Clemmons,The diagnosis and treatment of growth hormone deficiency in adults.
wu0915@ucla.edu,Yifeng Li,The role of antimicrobial peptides in cardiovascular physiology and disease.
green094@mc.duke.edu,Jennifer B Green,The dipeptidyl peptidase-4 inhibitors in type 2 diabetes mellitus: cardiovascular safety.
yxi@texasheart.org,Yutao Xi,Essential roles of EphrinB2 in mammalian heart: from development to diseases.
xiangmx@zju.edu.cn,Meixiang Xiang,Essential roles of EphrinB2 in mammalian heart: from development to diseases.
bebiondi@unina.it,Bernadette Biondi,Cardiovascular effects of mild hypothyroidism.
berdos@uvm.edu,Benedek Erdos,BDNF acting in the hypothalamus induces acute pressor responses under permissive control of angiotensin II.
james.tsai@yale.edu,James C Tsai,Influencing ocular blood flow in glaucoma patients: the cardiovascular system and healthy lifestyle choices.
ian.salt@glasgow.ac.uk,Ian P Salt,Examining the role of insulin in the regulation of cardiovascular health.
rkwok@rti.org,Richard K Kwok,A review and rationale for studying the cardiovascular effects of drinking water arsenic in women of reproductive age.
harrish@wyeth.com,Heather A Harris,Estrogen receptor-beta: recent lessons from in vivo studies.
el_chemaly-m@email.ulster.ac.uk,Melody Chemaly,Role of tumour necrosis factor alpha converting enzyme (TACE/ADAM17) and associated proteins in coronary artery disease and cardiac events.
jcamm@sgul.ac.uk,John Camm,Cardiac and vascular effects of fingolimod: mechanistic basis and clinical implications.
alison.brewer@kcl.ac.uk,Alison C Brewer,Redox regulation of gasotransmission in the vascular system: A focus on angiogenesis.
torill.berg@basalmed.uio.no,Torill Berg,Analysis of the pressor response to the K+ channel inhibitor 4-aminopyridine.
jdesesso@exponent.com,John M DeSesso,Vascular ontogeny within selected thoracoabdominal organs and the limbs.
berenson@tulane.edu,Gerald S Berenson,Childhood risk factors predict adult risk associated with subclinical cardiovascular disease. The Bogalusa Heart Study.
mrychter@ump.edu.pl,Marek Rychter,"Cilostazol-loaded electrospun three-dimensional systems for potential cardiovascular application: Effect of fibers hydrophilization on drug release, and cytocompatibility."
ologue@umc.edu,Omar C Logue,Preeclampsia and the brain: neural control of cardiovascular changes during pregnancy and neurological outcomes of preeclampsia.
patwardhan.kishor@gmail.com,Kishor Patwardhan,The history of the discovery of blood circulation: unrecognized contributions of Ayurveda masters.
anderson@icb.ufmg.br,Anderson J Ferreira,Cardiovascular effects of angiotensin A: a novel peptide of the renin-angiotensin system.
h-aslian@mail.com,Hossein Aslian,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
anna.delana@apss.tn.it,Anna Delana,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
stefano.renkaiser@poliambulanza.it,Stefano Ren Kaiser,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
eugenia.moretti@asuiud.sanita.fvg.it,Eugenia Moretti,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
claudio.foti@asuiud.sanita.fvg.it,Claudio Foti,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
paola.bregant@asuits.sanita.fvg.it,Paola Bregant,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
mario.dedenaro@asuiud.sanita.fvg.it,Mario de Denaro,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
francesco.longo@ts.infn.it,Francesco Longo,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
mara.severgnini@asuits.sanita.fvg.it,Mara Severgnini,A multicenter dosimetry study to evaluate the imaging dose from Elekta XVI and Varian OBI kV-CBCT systems to cardiovascular implantable electronic devices (CIEDs).
karolien.vandemaele@uzbrussel.be,Karolien Van De Maele,In utero programming and early detection of cardiovascular disease in the offspring of mothers with obesity.
nchlau002@myuct.ac.za,Lauren Nicholson,Assessing perinatal depression as an indicator of risk for pregnancy-associated cardiovascular disease.
s.davidson@ucl.ac.uk,Sean M Davidson,Exosomes and Cardiovascular Protection.
john.wahren@creativepeptides.se,John Wahren,C-peptide: new findings and therapeutic implications in diabetes.
neha.johnhenderson@montana.edu,Neha A John-Henderson,Diminished cardiovascular stress reactivity is associated with lower levels of social participation.
korakianitis@alum.mit.edu,T Korakianitis,"In-vitro investigation of the hemodynamic responses of the cerebral, coronary and renal circulations with a rotary blood pump installed in the descending aorta."
arthur.klatsky@kp.org,Arthur L Klatsky,Alcohol and cardiovascular health.
ksietsema@rei.edu,K Sietsema,Cardiovascular limitations in chronic pulmonary disease.
isabelle.marie@chu-rouen.fr,Isabelle Marie,[Pathogenesis of scleroderma].
sieberbl@mcw.edu,Maya Sieber-Blum,Cardiac neural crest stem cells.
rodrigomellogomes@hotmail.com,Rodrigo Mello Gomes,Postnatal early overfeeding induces cardiovascular dysfunction by oxidative stress in adult male Wistar rats.
cohnx001@umn.edu,Jay N Cohn,Identifying the risk and preventing the consequences of cardiovascular disease.
laurie_howes@health.qld.gov.au,Laurence Guy Howes,Cardiovascular effects of drugs used to treat Alzheimer's disease.
mario.malerba@unibs.it,Mario Malerba,Role of beta-blockers in patients with COPD: current perspective.
d_mtehrani@sbu.ac.ir,Dariush Minai-Tehrani,"Inhibitory action of dicyclomine on lipase activity, kinetics and molecular study."
fabio.fusi@unisi.it,Fabio Fusi,"The surge of flavonoids as novel, fine regulators of cardiovascular Ca(v) channels."
jayzhang@uab.edu,Jianyi Zhang,From Microscale Devices to 3D Printing: Advances in Fabrication of 3D Cardiovascular Tissues.
vinay.menon@virmedsim.com,Vinay Menon,Simulation of a human circulatory system.
schv@xanum.uam.mx,S Charleston-Villalobos,Study of impaired cardiovascular and respiratory coupling during orthostatic stress based on joint symbolic dynamics.
rpbusui@umich.edu,Rodica Pop-Busui,Cardiovascular Autonomic Neuropathy and Cardiovascular Outcomes in the Diabetes Control and Complications Trial/Epidemiology of Diabetes Interventions and Complications (DCCT/EDIC) Study.
isao45@fc.miyazaki-u.ac.jp,Isao Tsuneyoshi,Vascular reactivity in human arteries: from experimental study to clinical application.
gabriele.amann@akh-wien.ac.at,G Amann,[Pathomorphological findings in preterm infants].
robdavisrn@sbcglobal.net,Robert Allan Davis,The big chill: accidental hypothermia.
regine@popcbr.rockefeller.edu,Régine Sitruk-Ware,"Progestogens in hormonal replacement therapy: new molecules, risks, and benefits."
lamapj@umdnj.edu,Paul J Lama,Systemic reactions associated with ophthalmic medications.
schroeder@zphys1.uni-frankfurt.de,Katrin Schröder,Isoform specific functions of Nox protein-derived reactive oxygen species in the vasculature.
mdccld@nus.edu.sg,Chester L Drum,Microengineering in cardiovascular research: new developments and translational applications.
simran.sidhu@adelaide.edu.au,Simranjit K Sidhu,Aging alters muscle reflex control of autonomic cardiovascular responses to rhythmic contractions in humans.
mirwig@mfa.gwu.edu,Michael S Irwig,Cardiovascular health in transgender people.
march@kimail.dmed.iupui.edu,K L March,Methods of local gene delivery to vascular tissues.
ktsioufis@hippocratio.gr,Costas Tsioufis,GLP-1 receptor agonists and cardiovascular outcome trials: An update.
gbaldo@hcpa.edu.br,Guilherme Baldo,Cathepsin B inhibition attenuates cardiovascular pathology in mucopolysaccharidosis I mice.
dfsu2008@gmail.com,Ding-Feng Su,The PI3K signaling-mediated nitric oxide contributes to cardiovascular effects of angiotensin-(1-7) in the nucleus tractus solitarii of rats.
wangwz68@163.com,Wei-Zhong Wang,The PI3K signaling-mediated nitric oxide contributes to cardiovascular effects of angiotensin-(1-7) in the nucleus tractus solitarii of rats.
zamir@uwo.ca,M Zamir,Arterial branching within the confines of fractal L-system formalism.
sarah.parker@cshs.org,Sarah J Parker,"Precision Profiling of the Cardiovascular Post-Translationally Modified Proteome: Where There Is a Will, There Is a Way."
akbarzad@ut.ac.ir,Pooria Akbarzadeh,Pulsatile magneto-hydrodynamic blood flows through porous blood vessels using a third grade non-Newtonian fluids model.
sanchezdelatorre@gmail.com,Manuel Sánchez-de-la-Torre,Intermittent Hypoxia-Induced Cardiovascular Remodeling Is Reversed by Normoxia in a Mouse Model of Sleep Apnea.
melissa.colbert@chmcc.org,Melissa C Colbert,Retinoids and cardiovascular developmental defects.
nutriflourint2015@gmail.com,G Krishnamoorthy-Natarajan,BK Channels in the Vascular System.
deepakc@simtech.a-star.edu.sg,Deepak Choudhury,Microfluidic platforms for modeling biological barriers in the circulatory system.
jackie.wallace@faht.scot.nhs.uk,I W Campbell,The Clinical Significance of PPAR Gamma Agonism.
meyoung@bcm.edu,Martin E Young,"The circadian clock within the heart: potential influence on myocardial gene expression, metabolism, and function."
kurzhaym@uni-freiburg.de,H Kurz,Physiology of angiogenesis.
tongwang316@163.com,Tong Wang,"Long noncoding RNAs: Novel molecules in cardiovascular biology, disease and regeneration."
gpierce@sbrc.ca,Grant N Pierce,The toxicity of dietary trans fats.
j.felix@erasmusmc.nl,Janine F Felix,The Influence of Known Genetic Variants on Subclinical Cardiovascular Outcomes in Childhood: Generation R Study.
t.a.lovick@bham.ac.uk,Thelma A Lovick,CCK as a modulator of cardiovascular function.
emdin@nsifc.ifc.pi.cnr.it,M Emdin,[Autonomic nervous system in diabetes].
chenc@mskcc.org,Carol L Chen,Cardiovascular prevention in the cancer survivor.
ksupple@lumc.edu,Kathy G Supple,Physiologic response to burn injury.
c.johnson@qub.ac.uk,Christopher D Johnson,Ultrasound imaging in teaching cardiac physiology.
sandra.barbosa@uerj.br,Sandra Barbosa-da-Silva,Intermittent fasting exerts beneficial metabolic effects on blood pressure and cardiac structure by modulating local renin-angiotensin system in the heart of mice fed high-fat or high-fructose diets.
chris.mclntyre@sdah-tr.trent.nhs.uk,C W McIntyre,Update on peritoneal dialysis solutions.
edecandia@rm.unicatt.it,Erica De Candia,Functional role of protease activated receptors in vascular biology.
luca.anzillotti@gmail.com,Luca Anzillotti,A case report positive for synthetic cannabinoids: are cardiovascular effects related to their protracted use?
francesca.marezza@icloud.com,Francesca Marezza,A case report positive for synthetic cannabinoids: are cardiovascular effects related to their protracted use?
luca.calo@unipr.it,Luca Calò,A case report positive for synthetic cannabinoids: are cardiovascular effects related to their protracted use?
antoniobanchini@gmail.com,Antonio Banchini,A case report positive for synthetic cannabinoids: are cardiovascular effects related to their protracted use?
rossana.cecchi@unipr.it,Rossana Cecchi,A case report positive for synthetic cannabinoids: are cardiovascular effects related to their protracted use?
dagmar.fuchs@unilever.com,Dagmar Fuchs,Effect of tea theaflavins and catechins on microvascular function.
young-de.graaf@unilever.com,Young de Graaf,Effect of tea theaflavins and catechins on microvascular function.
roelandvankerckhoven@yahoo.com,Roeland van Kerckhoven,Effect of tea theaflavins and catechins on microvascular function.
richard.draijer@unilever.com,Richard Draijer,Effect of tea theaflavins and catechins on microvascular function.
zhichao.zhou@ki.se,Zhichao Zhou,Uridine adenosine tetraphosphate and purinergic signaling in cardiovascular system: An update.
jiemi@vip.163.com,Jie Mi,[Impacts of hypertension on early changes of cardiovascular structure and function among children: a case-control study].
fabrizio.deponti@unibo.it,Fabrizio De Ponti,ESC position paper on cardiovascular toxicity of cancer treatments: challenges and expectations.
roger.dampney@sydney.edu.au,Roger A L Dampney,Central mechanisms regulating coordinated cardiovascular and respiratory function during stress and arousal.
bw17@le.ac.uk,B Williams,Mechanical influences on vascular smooth muscle cell function.
moldovan-1@medctr.osu.edu,Nicanor I Moldovan,"Functional adaptation: the key to plasticity of cardiovascular ""stem"" cells?"
mbondessonbolin@uh.edu,Maria Bondesson,Identification of vascular disruptor compounds by analysis in zebrafish embryos and mouse embryonic endothelial cells.
nicola.montano@unimi.it,Nicola Montano,Short sleep duration and cardiometabolic risk: from pathophysiology to clinical evidence.
atsushi.sugiyama@med.toho-u.ac.jp,Atsushi Sugiyama,Cardiohemodynamic and electrophysiological effects of a selective EP4 receptor agonist ONO--AE1--329 in the halothane-anesthetized dogs.
maciej.tomaszewski@manchester.ac.uk,Maciej Tomaszewski,Circulating microRNAs and hypertension--from new insights into blood pressure regulation to biomarkers of cardiovascular risk.
ryan.fryer@boehringer-ingelheim.com,Ryan M Fryer,"Long-term stability, reproducibility, and statistical sensitivity of a telemetry-instrumented dog model: A 27-month longitudinal assessment."
hjuo@mail.cmu.edu.tw,Suh-Hang H Juo,Early functional improvement after stroke correlates with cardiovascular fitness.
pnorsk@mfi.ku.dk,Peter Norsk,Cardiovascular and fluid volume control in humans in space.
adalamri1@sheffield.ac.uk,Abdulaziz Alamri,A corpus of potentially contradictory research claims from cardiovascular research abstracts.
soppenh@hotmail.com,Stephen Oppenheimer,Cerebrogenic cardiac arrhythmias: cortical lateralization and clinical significance.
jim_wang@berlex.com,Yi-Xin Wang,Cardiovascular functional phenotypes and pharmacological responses in apolipoprotein E deficient mice.
joettgen@caregroup.harvard.edu,P Oettgen,Transcriptional regulation of vascular development.
izucker@unmc.edu,Irving H Zucker,Cardiac sympathetic afferent denervation attenuates cardiac remodeling and improves cardiovascular dysfunction in rats with heart failure.
lowj@kgh.kari.net,James A Low,Determining the contribution of asphyxia to brain damage in the neonate.
michel.safar@htd.aphp.fr,Michel E Safar,Studies on arterial stiffness and wave reflections in hypertension.
raub.james@epa.gov,James A Raub,Psychophysiologic effects of Hatha Yoga on musculoskeletal and cardiopulmonary function: a literature review.
bertil.steen@geriatrik.gu.se,B Steen,[Biological aging--a mini review. Focus on heart/blood pressure and nutrition].
ttaylorc@health.usf.edu,T E Taylor-Clark,"Characterization of cardiovascular reflexes evoked by airway stimulation with allylisothiocyanate, capsaicin, and ATP in Sprague-Dawley rats."
mbehr@uni-bonn.de,Matthias Behr,Molecular aspects of respiratory and vascular tube development.
qifu@texashealth.org,Qi Fu,Hemodynamic and Electrocardiographic Aspects of Uncomplicated Singleton Pregnancy.
w.spiering@umcutrecht.nl,Wilko Spiering,Bisphosphonates for cardiovascular risk reduction: A systematic review and meta-analysis.
alan.groves@imperial.ac.uk,Alan M Groves,Cardiac magnetic resonance in the study of neonatal haemodynamics.
abalat@gantep.edu.tr,Ayse Balat,Children with chronic kidney disease and hypertension: could hypertension footprints be early biomarkers?
bruno.verges@chu-dijon.fr,B Vergès,"After the LEADER trial and SUSTAIN-6, how do we explain the cardiovascular benefits of some GLP-1 receptor agonists?"
r.n.clayton@keele.ac.uk,R N Clayton,Cardiovascular function in acromegaly.
czegledi.andras@pharm.unideb.hu,Andras Czegledi,Electrically-Induced Ventricular Fibrillation Alters Cardiovascular Function and Expression of Apoptotic and Autophagic Proteins in Rat Hearts.
tosakiagnes@med.unideb.hu,Agnes Tosaki,Electrically-Induced Ventricular Fibrillation Alters Cardiovascular Function and Expression of Apoptotic and Autophagic Proteins in Rat Hearts.
gyongyosi.alexandra@pharm.unideb.hu,Alexandra Gyongyosi,Electrically-Induced Ventricular Fibrillation Alters Cardiovascular Function and Expression of Apoptotic and Autophagic Proteins in Rat Hearts.
zilinyi.rita@pharm.unideb.hu,Rita Zilinyi,Electrically-Induced Ventricular Fibrillation Alters Cardiovascular Function and Expression of Apoptotic and Autophagic Proteins in Rat Hearts.
tosaki.arpad@pharm.unideb.hu,Arpad Tosaki,Electrically-Induced Ventricular Fibrillation Alters Cardiovascular Function and Expression of Apoptotic and Autophagic Proteins in Rat Hearts.
lekli.istvan@pharm.unideb.hu,Istvan Lekli,Electrically-Induced Ventricular Fibrillation Alters Cardiovascular Function and Expression of Apoptotic and Autophagic Proteins in Rat Hearts.
jmperezp@uma.es,José M Pérez-Pomares,Human Pluripotent Stem Cell Differentiation into Functional Epicardial Progenitor Cells.
robert.passier@utwente.nl,Robert Passier,Human Pluripotent Stem Cell Differentiation into Functional Epicardial Progenitor Cells.
finkelt@nih.gov,Toren Finkel,Autophagy as a regulator of cardiovascular redox homeostasis.
jmateika@med.wayne.edu,Jason H Mateika,Intermittent hypoxia: a low-risk research tool with therapeutic value in humans.
mohammad.abdollahi@utoronto.ca,Mohammad Abdollahi,Review of endocrine disorders associated with environmental toxicants and possible involved mechanisms.
liesl.zuhlke@uct.ac.za,Liesl Zühlke,Pre-conception counselling for key cardiovascular conditions in Africa: optimising pregnancy outcomes.
pankajgupta959@gmail.com,Pankaj Gupta,Cardiovascular Causes of Pediatric Airway Compression: A Pictorial Review.
pinskymr@ccm.upmc.edu,Michael R Pinsky,Cardiovascular issues in respiratory care.
pfd@pobox.upenn.edu,Peter F Davies,Hemodynamic shear stress and the endothelium in cardiovascular pathophysiology.
nickgreaves@doctors.org.uk,Nicholas Greaves,Gunshot bullet embolus with pellet migration from the left brachiocephalic vein to the right ventricle: a case report.
editorys@mail.ahwhptt.net.cn,Y S Ke,Endoxin:a major factor regulating cardiovascular system.
uwe.zeymer@t-online.de,Uwe Zeymer,Cardiovascular benefits of acarbose in impaired glucose tolerance and type 2 diabetes.
bernd.saugel@gmx.de,Bernd Saugel,Journal of Clinical Monitoring and Computing 2016 end of year summary: cardiovascular and hemodynamic monitoring.
szx0127@ccmu.edu.cn,Zhixiong Shi,Cardiovascular toxicity of decabrominated diphenyl ethers (BDE-209) and decabromodiphenyl ethane (DBDPE) in rats.
okamotoh@med.hokudai.ac.jp,Hiroshi Okamoto,Osteopontin and cardiovascular system.
rbaber@med.usyd.edu.au,Rod Baber,Phytoestrogens and post reproductive health.
vicenta.llorente@iibb.csic.es,Vicenta Llorente-Cortes,"Interplay between epicardial adipose tissue, metabolic and cardiovascular diseases."
jennie.walker@nottingham.ac.uk,Jennie Walker,Spinal cord injuries: acute care management and rehabilitation.
ian.puddey@uwa.edu.au,Ian B Puddey,Alcohol and Hypertension-New Insights and Lingering Controversies.
claire.bombardier@utoronto.ca,Claire Bombardier,An evidence-based evaluation of the gastrointestinal safety of coxibs.
rmaser@udel.edu,Raelene E Maser,Autonomic modulation in gestational diabetes mellitus.
raomanren@263sina.com,Man-Ren Rao,Effects of tetrandrine on cardiac and vascular remodeling.
xzfeng@nankai.edu.cn,XiZeng Feng,Cardiovascular toxicity and anxiety-like behavior induced by deltamethrin in zebrafish (Danio rerio) larvae.
chrisandra.shufelt@cshs.org,Chrisandra L Shufelt,Sex-Specific Physiology and Cardiovascular Disease.
jloscalz@bu.edu,Joseph Loscalzo,"Stem cells and regeneration of the cardiovascular system: facts, fictions, and uncertainties."
ping.wang@ccc.uab.edu,P Wang,Andrenomedullin and cardiovascular responses in sepsis.
zhanghao@iis.u-tokyo.ac.jp,Hao Zhang,Development of a Numerical Method for Patient-Specific Cerebral Circulation Using 1D-0D Simulation of the Entire Cardiovascular System with SPECT Data.
k.hecher@uke.de,Kurt Hecher,Long-term outcomes for monochorionic twins after laser therapy in twin-to-twin transfusion syndrome.
matt@vivonics-preclinical.com,Matt Skinner,Social-housing and use of double-decker cages in rat telemetry studies.
g.palaucaballero@maastrichtuniversity.nl,Georgina Palau-Caballero,Abnormal Ventricular and Aortic Wall Properties Can Cause Inconsistencies in Grading Aortic Regurgitation Severity: A Computer Simulation Study.
sunzilin1963@126.com,Zilin Sun,Heart Rate Recovery and Risk of Cardiovascular Events and All-Cause Mortality: A Meta-Analysis of Prospective Cohort Studies.
a.steptoe@ucl.ac.uk,Andrew Steptoe,The effect of beta-adrenergic blockade on inflammatory and cardiovascular responses to acute mental stress.
michael.j.goldfarb@mail.mcgill.ca,Michael Goldfarb,Review of published cases of adverse cardiovascular events after ingestion of energy drinks.
jukka.salonen@uku.fi,Jukka T Salonen,Clinical trials testing cardiovascular benefits of antioxidant supplementation.
blankfield@roadrunner.com,Robert P Blankfield,Implications of calculated intravascular volume changes upon atherosclerotic cardiovascular disease.
kammounikram@yahoo.fr,I Kammoun,[Utility of cardiovascular magnetic resonance in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy: when is it superior to echocardiography?].
sjnixon@ufl.edu,Sara Jo Nixon,Clarifying the neurobehavioral sequelae of moderate drinking lifestyles and acute alcohol effects with aging.
harold.kalant@utoronto.ca,H Kalant,"The pharmacology and toxicology of ""ecstasy"" (MDMA) and related drugs."
carmela.cosola@uniba.it,Carmela Cosola,Microbiota issue in CKD: how promising are gut-targeted approaches?
jason.gill@newcastle.ac.uk,Jason H Gill,Vascular Disrupting Agents in cancer treatment: Cardiovascular toxicity and implications for co-administration with other cancer chemotherapeutics.
andreas.stengel@charite.de,Andreas Stengel,Nesfatin-1: current status as a peripheral hormone and future prospects.
gsweeney@yorku.ca,Gary Sweeney,Cardiovascular effects of leptin.
jessica.franzen@hotmail.fr,Jessica Franzen,Wanting and liking in dysphoria: Cardiovascular and facial EMG responses during incentive processing.
kerstin.brinkmann@unige.ch,Kerstin Brinkmann,Wanting and liking in dysphoria: Cardiovascular and facial EMG responses during incentive processing.
paul.nestel@baker.edu.au,Paul Nestel,Isoflavones: their effects on cardiovascular risk and functions.
lindsay.brown@usq.edu.au,Lindsay Brown,Cyanidin 3-glucoside improves diet-induced metabolic syndrome in rats.
ehayes@bart.rprc.washington.edu,E S Hayes,Adenosine receptors and cardiovascular disease: the adenosine-1 receptor (A1) and A1 selective ligands.
pprabhakaran@peds.uab.edu,Priya Prabhakaran,Clinically-relevant cardiopulmonary interactions for the pediatric intensivist.
mhumphreys@medsfgh.ucsf.edu,Michael H Humphreys,Cardiovascular and renal actions of melanocyte-stimulating hormone peptides.
kshoemak@uwo.ca,J Kevin Shoemaker,Forebrain organization for autonomic cardiovascular control.
paulrwade@comcast.net,Paul R Wade,"Nonclinical Cardiovascular Studies of Prucalopride, a Highly Selective 5-Hydroxytryptamine 4 Receptor Agonist."
zhaoxin@nankai.edu.cn,Xin Zhao,Combined treatment of melatonin and sodium tanshinone IIA sulfonate reduced the neurological and cardiovascular toxicity induced by deltamethrin in zebrafish.
chendy@nankai.edu.cn,DongYan Chen,Combined treatment of melatonin and sodium tanshinone IIA sulfonate reduced the neurological and cardiovascular toxicity induced by deltamethrin in zebrafish.
william.bauman@va.gov,William A Bauman,Implication of altered autonomic control for orthostatic tolerance in SCI.
gdorn@dom.wustl.edu,Gerald W 2nd Dorn,Adrenergic signaling polymorphisms and their impact on cardiovascular disease.
james.jauchem@brooks.af.mil,James R Jauchem,"Effects of low-level radio-frequency (3kHz to 300GHz) energy on human cardiovascular, reproductive, immune, and other systems: a review of the recent literature."
muhammad.aslam@physiologie.med.uni-giessen.de,Muhammad Aslam,"Simultaneous Isolation of High Quality Cardiomyocytes, Endothelial Cells, and Fibroblasts from an Adult Rat Heart."
srihari_physio@yahoo.com,Srihari Sharma,Development of a yoga module targeting cardiovascular health for patients with post-myocardial left ventricular dysfunction in India.
tenforde@ncrp.com,Thomas S Tenforde,Magnetically induced electric fields and currents in the circulatory system.
robert-roghair@uiowa.edu,Robert D Roghair,Oral oestrogen reverses ovariectomy-induced morning surge hypertension in growth-restricted mice.
xiaohualiu8@gmail.com,Xiaohua Liu,Intrapericardial capsaicin and bradykinin induce different cardiac-somatic and cardiovascular reflexes in rats.
mpedrosa@ufrnet.br,Matheus F Fernandes-Pedrosa,"Homology modeling, vasorelaxant and bradykinin-potentiating activities of a novel hypotensin found in the scorpion venom from Tityus stigmurus."
victoria_claydon@sfu.ca,Victoria E Claydon,Intermittent calf compression reverses lower limb pooling and improves cardiovascular control during passive orthostasis.
pinsky@smtp.anes.upmc.edu,M R Pinsky,Clinical applications of cardiopulmonary interactions.
sahassan1@mdanderson.org,Saamir A Hassan,Chemotherapeutic Agents and the Risk of Ischemia and Arterial Thrombosis.
mathieug@andrew.cmu.edu,Mathieu Guillame-Bert,Learning temporal rules to forecast instability in continuously monitored patients.
robdbrok@umich.edu,Robert D Brook,"Obesity, weight loss, and vascular function."
skaltsounis@pharm.uoa.gr,Leandros Skaltsounis,"Hydroxytyrosol ameliorates metabolic, cardiovascular and liver changes in a rat model of diet-induced metabolic syndrome: Pharmacological and metabolism-based investigation."
bmlee@skku.edu,Byung-Mu Lee,"α-Linolenic acid: nutraceutical, pharmacological and toxicological evaluation."
eduardobrambila1@yahoo.com.mx,Eduardo Brambila,Chronic cadmium exposure in rats produces pancreatic impairment and insulin resistance in multiple peripheral tissues.
michaldzieciol@wp.pl,Michał Dzięcioł,The influence of Sildenafil citrate on uterine tissue perfusion and the cardiovascular system during the luteal phase of the ovarian cycle in cows.
vcara@ucm.es,Victoria Cachofeiro,Galectin-3 Participates in Cardiovascular Remodeling Associated With Obesity.
antonkutikhin@gmail.com,Anton G Kutikhin,Shear stress: An essential driver of endothelial progenitor cells.
schiffe@ircm.umontreal.ca,E L Schiffrin,Endothelin: role in hypertension.
thanamo@med.miyazaki-u.ac.jp,Takamitsu Hanamori,Fluctuations of the spontaneous discharge in the posterior insular cortex neurons are associated with changes in the cardiovascular system in rats.
rocchicamilla@gmail.com,Camilla Rocchi,Does continuous positive airway pressure treatment affect autonomic nervous system in patients with severe obstructive sleep apnea?
aevintur@ucalgary.ca,Angela Elena Vinturache,Angiotensin type 1 and type 2 receptors during ontogeny: cardiovascular and renal effects.
fjmitc@unimelb.edu.au,Frederick J Mitchelson,The pharmacology of McN-A-343.
trotier@rmsb.u-bordeaux2.fr,Aurélien J Trotier,"Positive contrast high-resolution 3D-cine imaging of the cardiovascular system in small animals using a UTE sequence and iron nanoparticles at 4.7, 7 and 9.4 T."
lefrancois@rmsb.u-bordeaux2.fr,William Lefrançois,"Positive contrast high-resolution 3D-cine imaging of the cardiovascular system in small animals using a UTE sequence and iron nanoparticles at 4.7, 7 and 9.4 T."
kvr-88@hotmail.com,Kris Van Renterghem,"Positive contrast high-resolution 3D-cine imaging of the cardiovascular system in small animals using a UTE sequence and iron nanoparticles at 4.7, 7 and 9.4 T."
franconi@rmsb.u-bordeaux2.fr,Jean-Michel Franconi,"Positive contrast high-resolution 3D-cine imaging of the cardiovascular system in small animals using a UTE sequence and iron nanoparticles at 4.7, 7 and 9.4 T."
thiaudiere@rmsb.u-bordeaux2.fr,Eric Thiaudière,"Positive contrast high-resolution 3D-cine imaging of the cardiovascular system in small animals using a UTE sequence and iron nanoparticles at 4.7, 7 and 9.4 T."
miraux@rmsb.u-bordeaux2.fr,Sylvain Miraux,"Positive contrast high-resolution 3D-cine imaging of the cardiovascular system in small animals using a UTE sequence and iron nanoparticles at 4.7, 7 and 9.4 T."
muraty@uludag.edu.tr,Murat Yalcin,Central mechanism underlying pressor and bradycardic effect of intracerebroventricularly injected arachidonic acid.
pclisboa@uerj.br,Patricia Cristina Lisboa,Dietary calcium supplementation in adult rats reverts brown adipose tissue dysfunction programmed by postnatal early overfeeding.
sami.omar@kcl.ac.uk,Sami A Omar,Nitrite reduction and cardiovascular protection.
andrew.1.webb@kcl.ac.uk,Andrew James Webb,Nitrite reduction and cardiovascular protection.
gkassab@iupui.edu,Ghassan S Kassab,Biomechanics of the cardiovascular system: the aorta as an illustratory example.
jafarib@uci.edu,Behrouz Jafari,Sleep Architecture and Blood Pressure.
selcukozturk85@hotmail.com,Selcuk Ozturk,Synthetic Cannabinoids and Cardiac Arrhythmia Risk: Review of the Literature.
mille278@tc.umn.edu,Leslie W Miller,Cardiovascular toxicities of immunosuppressive agents.
julianne_holt-lunstad@byu.edu,Julianne Holt-Lunstad,Social stressors and cardiovascular response: influence of ambivalent relationships and behavioral ambivalence.
wbf@udel.edu,William B Farquhar,The Influence of Dietary Salt Beyond Blood Pressure.
deborah.clegg@cshs.org,Deborah J Clegg,An Emerging Role of Natriuretic Peptides: Igniting the Fat Furnace to Fuel and Warm the Heart.
nikhil_tandon@hotmail.com,Nikhil Tandon,Interpreting Cardiovascular Endpoints in Trials of Antihyperglycemic Drugs.
pietroiusti@med.uniroma2.it,Antonio Pietroiusti,Health implications of engineered nanomaterials.
ddobrosielski@towson.edu,Devon A Dobrosielski,"Associations between vasodilatory capacity, physical activity and sleep among younger and older adults."
jfsaraiva@uol.com.br,Francisco Kerr Saraiva,Cardiovascular effects of glucagon-like peptide 1 (GLP-1) receptor agonists.
andreisposito@gmail.com,Andrei C Sposito,Cardiovascular effects of glucagon-like peptide 1 (GLP-1) receptor agonists.
cpetitoboyce@gradientcorp.com,Catherine Petito Boyce,Providing perspective for interpreting cardiovascular mortality risks associated with ozone exposures.
jgoodman@gradientcorp.com,Julie E Goodman,Providing perspective for interpreting cardiovascular mortality risks associated with ozone exposures.
ssax@gradientcorp.com,Sonja N Sax,Providing perspective for interpreting cardiovascular mortality risks associated with ozone exposures.
cloftus@gradientcorp.com,Christine T Loftus,Providing perspective for interpreting cardiovascular mortality risks associated with ozone exposures.
torukawa@ncvc.go.jp,Toru Kawada,Open-loop static and dynamic characteristics of the arterial baroreflex system in rabbits and rats.
louise.faerch@regionh.dk,Louise H Færch,"Effects of angiotensin II receptor blockade on cerebral, cardiovascular, counter-regulatory, and symptomatic responses during hypoglycaemia in patients with type 1 diabetes."
andreas.kramer@uni-konstanz.de,Andreas Kramer,"How to prevent the detrimental effects of two months of bed-rest on muscle, bone and cardiovascular system: an RCT."
rtamisier@chu-grenoble.fr,Renaud Tamisier,Sleep biology updates: Hemodynamic and autonomic control in sleep disorders.
a.t.lely@umcutrecht.nl,A Titia Lely,Cardiovascular Sequels During and After Preeclampsia.
phardy@shrp.umsmed.edu,S G Hardy,Hypothalamic projections to cardiovascular centers of the medulla.
a.singhal@ich.ucl.ac.uk,Atul Singhal,Early nutrition and long-term cardiovascular health.
caseyamueller@gmail.com,Casey A Mueller,The actions of the renin-angiotensin system on cardiovascular and osmoregulatory function in embryonic chickens (Gallus gallus domesticus).
daniel.theisen@crp-sante.lu,Daniel Theisen,Cardiovascular determinants of exercise capacity in the Paralympic athlete with spinal cord injury.
mauro.maniscalco@icsmaugeri.it,Mauro Maniscalco,Left ventricular hypertrophy as protective factor after bypass grafting.
afifelkhuffash@rcsi.ie,Afif El-Khuffash,Future perspectives on the use of deformation analysis to identify the underlying pathophysiological basis for cardiovascular compromise in neonates.
osamu.nakagawa@ncvc.go.jp,Osamu Nakagawa,Pharyngeal arch artery defects and lethal malformations of the aortic arch and its branches in mice deficient for the Hrt1/Hey1 transcription factor.
pedzisai.mazengenya@wits.ac.za,P Mazengenya,A critical appraisal of 11(th) century treatise by Ibn Sina (Avicenna) on the anatomy of the vascular system: Comparison with modern anatomic descriptions.
dixon.thomas@gmail.com,Dixon Thomas,Coxibs Refocus Attention on the Cardiovascular Risks of Non-Aspirin NSAIDs.
a.chester@imperial.ac.uk,Adrian H Chester,Endothelin-1 and the aortic valve.
ashi@nagasaki-u.ac.jp,Kazuto Ashizawa,The phrenic nerve with accompanying vessels: a silent cause of cardiovascular border obliteration on chest radiography.
ykodan@gmail.com,Yutaka Koda,Feasibility of intermittent back-filtrate infusion hemodiafiltration to reduce intradialytic hypotension in patients with cardiovascular instability: a pilot study.
lawrence.m.segal@gsk.com,Lawrence Segal,Effects of Adjuvant Systems on the cardiovascular and respiratory functions in telemetered conscious dogs and anaesthetised rats.
jcarter@mtu.edu,Jason R Carter,Role of the ovarian cycle on neural cardiovascular control in sleep-deprived women.
everettd@njc.org,Douglas Curran-Everett,A classic learning opportunity from Arthur Guyton and colleagues (1955): circuit analysis of venous return.
sstevens@kumc.edu,Mary Suzanne Stevens,"Restless Legs Syndrome/Willis-Ekbom Disease Morbidity: Burden, Quality of Life, Cardiovascular Aspects, and Sleep."
w.thomas@uq.edu.au,Walter G Thomas,Bitter taste receptor agonists elicit G-protein-dependent negative inotropy in the murine heart.
giacca@icgeb.org,Mauro Giacca,Adeno-associated virus vectors as therapeutic and investigational tools in the cardiovascular system.
n.riksen@aig.umcn.nl,Niels P Riksen,The cardioprotective effects of mineralocorticoid receptor antagonists.
shara7g@vt.edu,Shara S Grant,Controlling for caffeine in cardiovascular research: A critical review.
kmagruder@wisc.edu,Katherine P Magruder,Controlling for caffeine in cardiovascular research: A critical review.
bhfriedm@vt.edu,Bruce H Friedman,Controlling for caffeine in cardiovascular research: A critical review.
jtrehm@gmail.com,Jürgen Rehm,Cardiovascular effects of alcohol consumption.
dinesh.bangari@genzyme.com,Dinesh S Bangari,α-Galactosidase A knockout mice: progressive organ pathology resembles the type 2 later-onset phenotype of Fabry disease.
paul.docherty@canterbury.ac.nz,P D Docherty,A Review of Arterial Phantom Fabrication Methods for Flow Measurement Using PIV Techniques.
chris.overall@ubc.ca,Christopher M Overall,Dilating the degradome: matrix metalloproteinase 2 (MMP-2) cuts to the heart of the matter.
phyhanj@inje.ac.kr,Jin Han,Gaseous Signaling Molecules in Cardiovascular Function: From Mechanisms to Clinical Translation.
arianna.dimolfetta@gmail.com,Arianna Di Molfetta,The use of a numerical model to simulate the cavo-pulmonary assistance in Fontan circulation: a preliminary verification.
priyank_221084@yahoo.com,Priyank Shah,Complete Heart Block From Chronic Marijuana Use.
michal.zeman@uniba.sk,Michal Zeman,Sex-specific cardiovascular susceptibility to ischaemic myocardial injury following exposure to prenatal hypoxia.
schuesslerd@wustl.edu,John P Boineau,Left ventricular muscle band (VMB): thoughts on its physiologic and clinical implications.
drrajashahzad@hotmail.com,Shahzad G Raja,Evaluation of clinical efficacy of fasudil for the treatment of pulmonary arterial hypertension.
dtulis@wpo.nccu.edu,David Anthony Tulis,Salutary properties of YC-1 in the cardiovascular and hematological systems.
susan.wood@uscmed.sc.edu,Susan K Wood,Individual differences in the locus coeruleus-norepinephrine system: Relevance to stress-induced cardiovascular vulnerability.
csimone@nyproton.com,Charles B 2nd Simone,Evolving Role of Novel Quantitative PET Techniques to Detect Radiation-Induced Complications.
bellavere@rizzola.it,F Bellavere,Effects of aerobic or resistance exercise training on cardiovascular autonomic function of subjects with type 2 diabetes: A pilot study.
paolo.moghetti@univr.it,P Moghetti,Effects of aerobic or resistance exercise training on cardiovascular autonomic function of subjects with type 2 diabetes: A pilot study.
avivab@umdnj.edu,Abraham Aviv,"Salt consumption, reactive oxygen species and cardiovascular ageing: a hypothetical link."
graciela.pavon@univ-paris13.fr,Graciela Pavon-Djavid,Myocardial infarction and gut microbiota: An incidental connection.
erikkonrad.grasser@unifr.ch,Erik Konrad Grasser,Cardiovascular and cerebrovascular effects in response to red bull consumption combined with mental stress.
wangrui@duke.usask.ca,Rui Wang,"Two's company, three's a crowd: can H2S be the third endogenous gaseous transmitter?"
pino.bax@unipd.it,Giuseppe Bax,Autonomic testing: which value for each cardiovascular test? An observational study.
victor.convertino@amedd.army.mil,Victor A Convertino,Status of cardiovascular issues related to space flight: Implications for future research directions.
d.coates@leeds.ac.uk,David Coates,The angiotensin converting enzyme (ACE).
jwcain@vcu.edu,John W Cain,Criterion for stable reentry in a ring of cardiac tissue.
r.i.g.holt@southampton.ac.uk,Richard I G Holt,Is human growth hormone an ergogenic aid?
mss35@le.ac.uk,Meetal Solanki,Cytochrome P450 2J2: Potential Role in Drug Metabolism and Cardiotoxicity.
xuan006@126.com,Wei Lü,"Sleep restriction undermines cardiovascular adaptation during stress, contingent on emotional stability."
brian.hughes@nuigalway.ie,Brian M Hughes,"Sleep restriction undermines cardiovascular adaptation during stress, contingent on emotional stability."
beth.brickner@utsouthwestern.edu,M Elizabeth Brickner,Cardiovascular management in pregnancy: congenital heart disease.
nathan.bryan@bcm.edu,Nathan S Bryan,Inorganic nitrite and nitrate: evidence to support consideration as dietary nutrients.
vickas.patel@temple.edu,Vickas V Patel,GATA-Binding Factor 6 Contributes to Atrioventricular Node Development and Function.
fernandhp@unican.es,Pablo Fdez-Arroyabe,"Schumann resonance and cardiovascular hospital admission in the area of Granada, Spain: An event coincidence analysis approach."
yashar.seyed.vahedein@rit.edu,Yashar Seyed Vahedein,CardioFAN: open source platform for noninvasive assessment of pulse transit time and pulsatile flow in hyperelastic vascular networks.
pannetwm@slu.edu,W Michael Panneton,The mammalian diving response: an enigmatic reflex to preserve life?
morita.cell@dent.tmd.ac.jp,Ikuo Morita,Distinct functions of COX-1 and COX-2.
sravassa@unav.es,Susana Ravassa,Association of low GLP-1 with oxidative stress is related to cardiac disease and outcome in patients with type 2 diabetes mellitus: a pilot study.
rkaras@lifespan.orgusa,Richard H Karas,Animal models of the cardiovascular effects of exogenous hormones.
felicia.antohe@icbp.ro,Felicia Antohe,"Endothelial cells and macrophages, partners in atherosclerotic plaque progression."
yelsayed@exchange.hsc.mb.ca,Yasser N Elsayed,Integrated evaluation of hemodynamics: a novel approach for the assessment and management of preterm infants with compromised systemic circulation.
fkleinmarcondes@yahoo.com.br,Fernanda K Marcondes,A puzzle used to teach the cardiac cycle.
gemma.figtree@sydney.edu.au,Gemma A Figtree,Redox modification of caveolar proteins in the cardiovascular system- role in cellular signalling and disease.
ddas@neuron.uchc.edu,Dipak K Das,Commentary on 'resveratrol commonly displays hormesis: occurrence and biomedical significance' by Calabrese et al.
ramesh.marrey@cardinalhealth.com,Ramesh Marrey,Validating Fatigue Safety Factor Calculation Methods for Cardiovascular Stents.
gologanu@gmail.com,Daniela Gologanu,[Dynamic hyperinflation -- the main mechanism of decreased exercise tolerance in patients with COPD].
s.e.carter@2014.ljmu.ac.uk,S E Carter,Energy expenditure and heart rate response to breaking up sedentary time with three different physical activity interventions.
sashah@ochsner.org,Sangeeta B Shah,Family Planning and Pregnancy Management in Adults with Congenital Heart Disease.
satish.raj@ucalgary.ca,Satish R Raj,Orthostatic Hypotension: A Practical Approach to Investigation and Management.
ashina@dadlnet.dk,Messoud Ashina,Migraine and the trigeminovascular system-40 years and counting.
r.vanloon@swansea.ac.uk,Raoul Van Loon,A data-driven model to study utero-ovarian blood flow physiology during pregnancy.
radovitstamas@yahoo.com,Tamás Radovits,[Novel antioxidant therapeutic strategies for cardiovascular dysfunction associated with ageing].
carolina-pieroni@hotmail.com,Carolina Pieroni Andrade,Reliability of heart period and systolic arterial pressure variabilities in women with fibromyalgia syndrome.
robert.kloner@hmri.org,Robert A Kloner,Cardiovascular effects of marijuana.
accrouch@umich.edu,A Colleen Crouch,In Vivo MRI Assessment of Blood Flow in Arteries and Veins from Head-to-Toe Across Age and Sex in C57BL/6 Mice.
michael.kasper@mailbox.tu-dresden.de,Michael Kasper,Phenotypic characterization of pulmonary arteries in normal and diseased lung.
krigatto@gmail.com,K Rigatto,Moderate hyperhomocysteinemia provokes dysfunction of cardiovascular autonomic system and liver oxidative stress in rats.
kolanowski@endo.ucl.ac.be,J Kolanowski,A risk-benefit assessment of anti-obesity drugs.
patelhitenm@gmail.com,Hiten Mohanbhai Patel,A Rare Entity: Traumatic Thoracic Aortic Injury in a Patient with Aberrant Right Subclavian Artery.
kkuchta@mednet.ucla.edu,Kenneth F Kuchta,Pathophysiologic changes of obesity.
roger.seymour@adelaide.edu.au,Roger S Seymour,Cardiovascular Physiology of Dinosaurs.
adamsj@ccf.org,Josephine C Adams,Fascin protrusions in cell interactions.
gasgenie@gmail.com,Ki Jinn Chin,Local anesthetic systemic toxicity: Continuing Professional Development.
egomez-sanchez@umc.edu,Elise P Gomez-Sanchez,Brain mineralocorticoid receptors in cognition and cardiovascular homeostasis.
j.niebauer@salk.at,Josef Niebauer,"Molecular effects of exercise training in patients with cardiovascular disease: focus on skeletal muscle, endothelium, and myocardium."
rstubbs@uab.edu,R Shane Tubbs,Wang Qingren and the 19th century Chinese doctrine of the bloodless heart.
morag.young@princehenrys.org,Morag J Young,Mineralocorticoid receptors in the heart: lessons from cell-selective transgenic animals.
ambrose.chiang@duke.edu,Ambrose A Chiang,Obstructive sleep apnea and chronic intermittent hypoxia: a review.
ramezani@endocrine.ac.ir,Fahimeh Ramezani Tehrani,Association between duration of endogenous estrogen exposure and cardiovascular outcomes: A population - based cohort study.
czyzewski_lukasz@wp.pl,Ł Czyżewski,24-hour Arterial Stiffness Monitoring in Kidney Transplant Recipients in the Early Postoperative Period.
jean-pierre.fauvel@chu-lyon.fr,J P Fauvel,[Cardiovascular impact of psychological stress].
gfigtree@med.usyd.edu.au,Gemma A Figtree,Oxidative regulation of the Na(+)-K(+) pump in the cardiovascular system.
ataylor@columbia.edu,Anne L Taylor,Nitric oxide modulation as a therapeutic strategy in heart failure.
sylvia.boesch@i-med.ac.at,Sylvia Boesch,Autonomic function testing in Friedreich's ataxia.
jean-luc.cracowski@univ-grenoble-alpes.fr,Jean-Luc Cracowski,Targeting the Prostacyclin Pathway: Beyond Pulmonary Arterial Hypertension.
cszxli@163.com,Sai-Yu Li,"Particulate matter (PM10) induces cardiovascular developmental toxicity in zebrafish embryos and larvae via the ERS, Nrf2 and Wnt pathways."
xiaohan_0818@163.com,Yun Zhang,"Particulate matter (PM10) induces cardiovascular developmental toxicity in zebrafish embryos and larvae via the ERS, Nrf2 and Wnt pathways."
heidemarie.pilz@wienkav.at,Heidemarie Pilz,[Primary and secondary prevention of cardiovascular events through hormone replacement therapy (HRT)].
ricardofelixmorais@gmail.com,Ricardo Morais,[How xenon works: neuro and cardioprotection mechanisms].
rmcraven@hotmail.com,R Craven,Ketamine.
ykoga@gunma-u.ac.jp,Yasuhiko Koga,"Roles of Cyclic AMP Response Element Binding Activation in the ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK Signalling Pathway in Central Nervous System, Cardiovascular System, Osteoclast Differentiation and Mucin and Cytokine Production."
m12702056@gunma-u.ac.jp,Hiroaki Tsurumaki,"Roles of Cyclic AMP Response Element Binding Activation in the ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK Signalling Pathway in Central Nervous System, Cardiovascular System, Osteoclast Differentiation and Mucin and Cytokine Production."
a-haruka@gunma-u.ac.jp,Haruka Aoki-Saito,"Roles of Cyclic AMP Response Element Binding Activation in the ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK Signalling Pathway in Central Nervous System, Cardiovascular System, Osteoclast Differentiation and Mucin and Cytokine Production."
m1620012@gunma-u.ac.jp,Makiko Sato,"Roles of Cyclic AMP Response Element Binding Activation in the ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK Signalling Pathway in Central Nervous System, Cardiovascular System, Osteoclast Differentiation and Mucin and Cytokine Production."
m09702007@gunma-u.ac.jp,Masakiyo Yatomi,"Roles of Cyclic AMP Response Element Binding Activation in the ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK Signalling Pathway in Central Nervous System, Cardiovascular System, Osteoclast Differentiation and Mucin and Cytokine Production."
k-kanplude3@jcom.home.ne.jp,Kazutaka Takehara,"Roles of Cyclic AMP Response Element Binding Activation in the ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK Signalling Pathway in Central Nervous System, Cardiovascular System, Osteoclast Differentiation and Mucin and Cytokine Production."
hisadat@gunma-u.ac.jp,Takeshi Hisada,"Roles of Cyclic AMP Response Element Binding Activation in the ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK Signalling Pathway in Central Nervous System, Cardiovascular System, Osteoclast Differentiation and Mucin and Cytokine Production."
ndvaziri@uci.edu,N D Vaziri,Cardiovascular effects of erythropoietin and anemia correction.
jesper.fleischer@ki.au.dk,Jesper Fleischer,Cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy is associated with macrovascular risk factors in type 2 diabetes: new technology used for routine large-scale screening adds new insight.
asaithamby.aroumougame@utsouthwestern.edu,Aroumougame Asaithamby,Ionizing radiation and heart risks.
ctyen@ccms.ntu.edu.tw,Chen-Tung Yen,Comparisons of terminal densities of cardiovascular function-related projections from the amygdala subnuclei.
tcudd@cvm.tamu.edu,T A Cudd,"Thromboxane A2 does not act at the carotid sinus to mediate cardiovascular, adrenocorticotropin, cortisol, or blood gas responses."
nina.hakacova@gmail.com,Nina Hakacova,The ability of mitral papillary muscle positions to explain QRS complex characteristics in humans.
neil.macintyre@duke.edu,Neil R MacIntyre,Mechanisms of functional loss in patients with chronic lung disease.
marc.dweck@ed.ac.uk,Marc R Dweck,MR/PET Imaging of the Cardiovascular System.
blankfield@adelphia.net,Robert P Blankfield,The thermoregulatory-vascular remodeling hypothesis: an explanation for essential hypertension.
dario.giugliano@unicampania.it,Dario Giugliano,Type 2 diabetes and risk of heart failure: a systematic review and meta-analysis from cardiovascular outcome trials.
cuihongl00@sina.com,Hong Cui,Sulfur dioxide: a physiologic endothelium-derived relaxing factor.
adrian.wagg@ualberta.ca,Adrian S Wagg,Antimuscarinic treatment in overactive bladder: special considerations in elderly patients.
gavazzonimara@gmail.com,Mara Gavazzoni,Mechanism of cardiovascular toxicity by proteasome inhibitors: New paradigm derived from clinical and pre-clinical evidence.
hipirigoyen@incor.usp.br,Maria Cláudia Irigoyen,Low intensity resistance training improves systolic function and cardiovascular autonomic control in diabetic rats.
taija.makinen@igp.uu.se,Taija Mäkinen,Heterogeneity in the lymphatic vascular system and its origin.
david.elliott@mcri.edu.au,David A Elliott,"SIRPA, VCAM1 and CD34 identify discrete lineages during early human cardiovascular development."
gwilym.morris@manchester.ac.uk,Gwilym M Morris,Embryology of the Cardiac Conduction System Relevant to Arrhythmias.
shu.ye@soton.ac.uk,Shu Ye,Influence of matrix metalloproteinase genotype on cardiovascular disease susceptibility and outcome.
e.fliers@amc.uva.nl,Eric Fliers,Hypothalamic effects of thyroid hormone.
flora.wong@monash.edu,Flora Y Wong,Prone sleeping position in infancy: Implications for cardiovascular and cerebrovascular function.
olivialorello@gmail.com,O Lorello,Cardiovascular variables in eventing and endurance horses over a season.
ssule@jhmi.edu,Sangeeta Sule,"Abnormal body composition, cardiovascular endurance, and muscle strength in pediatric SLE."
clowenst@jhmi.edu,Charles J Lowenstein,Nitric oxide regulation of protein trafficking in the cardiovascular system.
christos.rammos@med.uni-duesseldorf.de,Christos Rammos,Age-related vascular gene expression profiling in mice.
ulrike.hendgen-cotta@med.uni-duesseldorf.de,Ulrike B Hendgen-Cotta,Age-related vascular gene expression profiling in mice.
rene.deenen@hhu.de,Rene Deenen,Age-related vascular gene expression profiling in mice.
julia.pohl@med.uni-duesseldorf.de,Julia Pohl,Age-related vascular gene expression profiling in mice.
stock.pia@web.de,Pia Stock,Age-related vascular gene expression profiling in mice.
christian.hinzmann@uni-duesseldorf.de,Christian Hinzmann,Age-related vascular gene expression profiling in mice.
malte.kelm@med.uni-duesseldorf.de,Malte Kelm,Age-related vascular gene expression profiling in mice.
tienush.rassaf@med.uni-duesseldorf.de,Tienush Rassaf,Age-related vascular gene expression profiling in mice.
prbrauer@creighton.edu,Philip R Brauer,MMPs--role in cardiovascular development and disease.
jouyang@126.com,Jun Ouyang,Locating the Human Cardiac Conduction System Using a 3D Model of Its Nutritious Arteries.
daijx2013@163.com,Jingxing Dai,Locating the Human Cardiac Conduction System Using a 3D Model of Its Nutritious Arteries.
cecilia.lowwang@ucdenver.edu,Cecilia C Low Wang,Cardiovascular Safety of Antidiabetic Drugs in the Hospital Setting.
ernesto.goldman@osumc.edu,Ernesto Goldman,Age-dependent cardiopulmonary interaction during airway obstruction: a simulation model.
martin.turner@staffs.ac.uk,Martin J Turner,Manipulating cardiovascular indices of challenge and threat using resource appraisals.
marc.jones@staffs.ac.uk,Marc V Jones,Manipulating cardiovascular indices of challenge and threat using resource appraisals.
d.sheffield@derby.ac.uk,David Sheffield,Manipulating cardiovascular indices of challenge and threat using resource appraisals.
j.b.barker@staffs.ac.uk,Jamie B Barker,Manipulating cardiovascular indices of challenge and threat using resource appraisals.
peter.coffee@stir.ac.uk,Peter Coffee,Manipulating cardiovascular indices of challenge and threat using resource appraisals.
jloscalzo@rics.bwh.harvard.edu,Joseph Loscalzo,Responses to reductive stress in the cardiovascular system.
oliver.friedrich@mbt.uni-erlangen.de,O Friedrich,Adding dimension to cellular mechanotransduction: Advances in biomedical engineering of multiaxial cell-stretch systems and their application to cardiovascular biomechanics and mechano-signaling.
b.martinac@victorchang.edu.au,B Martinac,Adding dimension to cellular mechanotransduction: Advances in biomedical engineering of multiaxial cell-stretch systems and their application to cardiovascular biomechanics and mechano-signaling.
ae81@aub.edu.lb,Ali H Eid,Estrogen in vascular smooth muscle cells: A friend or a foe?
jadimar@unav.es,J Díez,[Apoptosis in cardiovascular diseases].
walter.koch@temple.edu,Walter J Koch,The expanding GRK interactome: Implications in cardiovascular disease and potential for therapeutic development.
gkndri@gmail.com,Gautam Kaul,Health hazards associated with nanomaterials.
htyl@pd.jaring.my,H T Ong,Cardiovascular outcomes in the comparative hypertension drug trials: more consensus than controversy.
daniel.allen.grant@med.monash.edu.au,D A Grant,Ventricular constraint in the fetus and newborn.
amy.cheung@astrazeneca.com,S Y A Cheung,A tutorial on model informed approaches to cardiovascular safety with focus on cardiac repolarisation.
kkim61@hanyang.ac.kr,Ki-Hyun Kim,Waterpipe tobacco smoking and its human health impacts.
jay.mettetal@astrazeneca.com,Jerome T Mettetal,Quantitative pharmacokinetic-pharmacodynamic modelling of baclofen-mediated cardiovascular effects using BP and heart rate in rats.
russell.bialecki@dupont.com,Russell A Bialecki,Quantitative pharmacokinetic-pharmacodynamic modelling of baclofen-mediated cardiovascular effects using BP and heart rate in rats.
rmatyal1@bidmc.harvard.edu,Robina Matyal,Neuropeptide Y is an angiogenic factor in cardiovascular regeneration.
dario.diviani@unil.ch,Dario Diviani,Emerging roles of A-kinase anchoring proteins in cardiovascular pathophysiology.
sdalton@uga.edu,Stephen Dalton,Cardiac stem cells: at the heart of cell therapy.
knunes@fit.edu,Kenia Pedrosa Nunes,Unveiling the Interplay between the TLR4/MD2 Complex and HSP70 in the Human Cardiovascular System: A Computational Approach.
pmolin@lsuhsc.edu,P E Molina,"Opioids and opiates: analgesia with cardiovascular, haemodynamic and immune implications in critical illness."
frank_conlon@med.unc.edu,Frank L Conlon,Emerging Field of Cardiomics: High-Throughput Investigations into Transcriptional Regulation of Cardiovascular Development and Disease.
fraizzi@tin.it,Francesca Izzi,Daytime autonomic activity in idiopathic rapid eye movement sleep behavior disorder: a preliminary study.
keb18@le.ac.uk,Kieran Brack,Characterization of the intrinsic cardiac nervous system.
d.westermann@uke.de,Dirk Westermann,Cardiovascular Mortality in Chest Pain Patients: Comparison of Natriuretic Peptides With Novel Biomarkers of Cardiovascular Stress.
christopher.blesso@uconn.edu,Christopher N Blesso,Egg phospholipids and cardiovascular health.
massey@wsu.edu,L K Massey,Caffeine and the elderly.
deckberg@ekholmen.com,Dwain L Eckberg,Arterial baroreflexes and cardiovascular modeling.
prof.kangelis@uninove.br,Kátia De Angelis,Impact of combined exercise training on cardiovascular autonomic control and mortality in diabetic ovariectomized rats.
axel.goedecke@uni-duesseldorf.de,Axel Gödecke,On the impact of NO-globin interactions in the cardiovascular system.
d.skene@surrey.ac.uk,Debra J Skene,"Noisy and individual, but doable: shift-work research in humans."
fradiancona@yahoo.it,Francesco Piacenza,Effect of 6-month caloric restriction on Cu bound to ceruloplasmin in adult overweight subjects.
chiara.corsini@polimi.it,Chiara Corsini,Mathematical modelling of the maternal cardiovascular system in the three stages of pregnancy.
clemens.vonschacky@med.uni-muenchen.de,Clemens von Schacky,Omega-3 fatty acids and cardiovascular disease.
kodavanti.urmila@epa.gov,Urmila P Kodavanti,Stretching the stress boundary: Linking air pollution health effects to a neurohormonal stress response.
coughlin@cvrimail.ucsf.edu,S R Coughlin,"Protease-activated receptors in hemostasis, thrombosis and vascular biology."
twierzba@amg.gda.pl,Tomasz H Wierzba,[Unexpected failure of antioxidant clinical trials].
gioel.gabrio.secco@gmail.com,Gioel Gabrio Secco,Small-for-gestational-age birth is linked to cardiovascular dysfunction in early childhood.
lyxjd7151@163.com,Xiaorong Zeng,Atrial-selective block of sodium channels by acehytisine in rabbit myocardium.
cailinwm@163.com,Lin Cai,Atrial-selective block of sodium channels by acehytisine in rabbit myocardium.
kwang-chul.kwon@microsynbiotix.com,Kwang-Chul Kwon,An evaluation of microalgae as a recombinant protein oral delivery platform for fish using green fluorescent protein (GFP).
anagalmeida@gmail.com,Ana G Almeida,New prospects for the management of cardiovascular effects of tyrosine kinase inhibitors in patients with chronic myeloid leukemia.
rfreeman@bidmc.harvard.edu,Roy Freeman,Cardiovascular manifestations of autonomic epilepsy.
mshinsuke@k3.dion.ne.jp,Shinsuke Miyazaki,Intra-procedural evaluation of the cavo-tricuspid isthmus anatomy with different techniques: comparison of angiography and intracardiac echocardiography.
sanjaya.kuruppu@monash.edu,Sanjaya Kuruppu,Prothrombin activator-like toxin appears to mediate cardiovascular collapse following envenoming by Pseudonaja textilis.
lawrence.cohen@nyga.md,Lawrence B Cohen,"Patient monitoring during gastrointestinal endoscopy: why, when, and how?"
jregal@d.umn.edu,Jean F Regal,Differential effects of complement activation products c3a and c5a on cardiovascular function in hypertensive pregnant rats.
bhmachad@fmrp.usp.br,Benedito H Machado,Neurogenic hypertension and the secrets of respiration.
pmueller@med.wayne.edu,Patrick J Mueller,"(In)activity-related neuroplasticity in brainstem control of sympathetic outflow: unraveling underlying molecular, cellular, and anatomical mechanisms."
floyd.bell@uscmed.sc.edu,Floyd E 3rd Bell,Using ultrasound to teach medical students cardiac physiology.
steve.harvey@ualberta.ca,S Harvey,Extrapituitary growth hormone.
klaus.voelker@uni-muenster.de,Klaus Völker,"[Physical activity, hypertension, and cardiac and circulatory system]."
markkahn@mail.med.upenn.edu,Mark L Kahn,A BMPy Road for Venous Development.
giulia.chiesa@unimi.it,Giulia Chiesa,Nutraceuticals and Bioactive Components from Fish for Dyslipidemia and Cardiovascular Risk Reduction.
marco.busnelli@gmail.com,Marco Busnelli,Nutraceuticals and Bioactive Components from Fish for Dyslipidemia and Cardiovascular Risk Reduction.
stefano.manzini@gmail.com,Stefano Manzini,Nutraceuticals and Bioactive Components from Fish for Dyslipidemia and Cardiovascular Risk Reduction.
cinzia.parolini@unimi.it,Cinzia Parolini,Nutraceuticals and Bioactive Components from Fish for Dyslipidemia and Cardiovascular Risk Reduction.
hsalman@qu.edu.qa,Huseyin Enes Salman,Computational analysis for non-invasive detection of stenosis in peripheral arteries.
yigit@metu.edu.tr,Yigit Yazicioglu,Computational analysis for non-invasive detection of stenosis in peripheral arteries.
sizonvladimir@yandex.ru,V A Sizonov,Changes in Activities of Somatovisceral Systems in Newborn Rats under Conditions of Nicotinic Cholinoreceptor Blockage and Activation of Cholinoreactive Structures.
mblaha1@jhmi.edu,Michael J Blaha,Erectile dysfunction links to cardiovascular disease-defining the clinical value.
mark_frampton@urmc.rochester.edu,Mark W Frampton,Does inhalation of ultrafine particles cause pulmonary vascular effects in humans?
a.c.phillips@bham.ac.uk,Anna C Whittaker,"The behavioural, cognitive, and neural corollaries of blunted cardiovascular and cortisol reactions to acute psychological stress."
bill@mindbody1.org,William R Lovallo,Do low levels of stress reactivity signal poor states of health?
obenyehuda@crf.org,Ori Ben-Yehuda,Vascular and Metabolic Implications of Novel Targeted Cancer Therapies: Focus on Kinase Inhibitors.
javid.moslehi@vanderbilt.edu,Javid Moslehi,Vascular and Metabolic Implications of Novel Targeted Cancer Therapies: Focus on Kinase Inhibitors.
lyjlma@bjut.edu.cn,Youjun Liu,The numerical study on specialized treatment strategies of enhanced external counterpulsation for cardiovascular and cerebrovascular disease.
kristek@unpf.savba.sk,F Kristek,Pentaerythrityl tetranitrate attenuates structural changes in conduit arteries evoked by long-term NO-synthase inhibition.
msolufse@ncsu.edu,Mette S Olufsen,Cardiovascular regulation in response to multiple hemorrhages: analysis and parameter estimation.
bjclh2000@163.com,Li-Hong Chen,[Research advances in relationship between biological clock and cardiovascular diseases].
idiaquez@123.cl,Juan Idiaquez,Cardiovascular responses to isometric handgrip exercise in young patients with recurrent vasovagal syncope.
riturriaga@bio.puc.cl,Rodrigo Iturriaga,Cardiovascular responses to isometric handgrip exercise in young patients with recurrent vasovagal syncope.
w.chen.3@research.gla.ac.uk,W W Chen,Study of cardiovascular function using a coupled left ventricle and systemic circulation model.
hao.gao@glasgow.ac.uk,H Gao,Study of cardiovascular function using a coupled left ventricle and systemic circulation model.
xiaoyu.luo@glasgow.ac.uk,X Y Luo,Study of cardiovascular function using a coupled left ventricle and systemic circulation model.
nicholas.hill@glasgow.ac.uk,N A Hill,Study of cardiovascular function using a coupled left ventricle and systemic circulation model.
sedelm2@emory.edu,Scott Edelman,The effects of androgen deprivation therapy on cardiac function and heart failure: implications for management of prostate cancer.
pedro.g.lind@gmail.com,Pedro G Lind,Anatomical and spiral wave reentry in a simplified model for atrial electrophysiology.
shaoping.hou@drexelmed.edu,Shaoping Hou,A radio-telemetric system to monitor cardiovascular function in rats with spinal cord transection and embryonic neural stem cell grafts.
a.monnier@infonie.fr,Alain Monnier,Effects of adjuvant aromatase inhibitor therapy on lipid profiles.
adam.nelson@adelaide.edu.au,Adam J Nelson,Transcatheter aortic valve implantation: a new standard of care.
takeday@im2.m.kanazawa-u.ac.jp,Yoshiyu Takeda,Role of cardiovascular aldosterone in hypertension.
lnnielsen@aki.ku.dk,Lars Nybo,Hyperthermia and fatigue.
htanaka@austin.utexas.edu,H Tanaka,Effects of non-fat dairy products added to the routine diet on vascular function: a randomized controlled crossover trial.
jazbutyte.virginija@mh-hannover.de,V Jazbutyte,Mitochondrial dynamics: molecular mechanisms and the role in the heart.
francois.carre@univ-rennes1.fr,F Carré,[What is the athlete's heart?].
grote@med.uni-frankfurt.de,Phillip Grote,The lncRNA Locus Handsdown Regulates Cardiac Gene Programs and Is Essential for Early Mouse Development.
vnetti@conicet.gov.ar,Vanina A Netti,Dehydration affects cardiovascular nitric oxide synthases and caveolins in growing rats.
albertomaria.leopaldi@polimi.it,A M Leopaldi,A novel passive left heart platform for device testing and research.
l.w.vanlaake@umcutrecht.nl,Linda W Van Laake,Circadian rhythms and the molecular clock in cardiovascular biology and disease.
piers-blackett@ouhsc.edu,Piers Blackett,Integrating lipid screening with ideal cardiovascular health assessment in pediatric settings.
tadashi-tsubouchi@ds-pharma.co.jp,Tadashi Tsubouchi,"The in vitro pharmacology and non-clinical cardiovascular safety studies of a novel 5-HT(4) receptor agonist, DSP-6952."
daniel.mangels@uphs.upenn.edu,Daniel R Mangels,Catechins as Potential Mediators of Cardiovascular Health.
angelyn.bethel@dtu.ox.ac.uk,M Angelyn Bethel,Cardiovascular outcomes with glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonists in patients with type 2 diabetes: a meta-analysis.
aparry@glam.ac.uk,Andrew Parry,Management and treatment of local anaesthetic toxicity.
ruth.prassl@medunigraz.at,Ruth Prassl,Artificial High Density Lipoprotein Nanoparticles in Cardiovascular Research.
batlouni@cardiol.br,Michel Batlouni,"[Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs: cardiovascular, cerebrovascular and renal effects]."
lraij@med.miami.edu,Leopoldo Raij,Nitric oxide and cardiovascular and renal effects.
ishizaka@osaka-med.ac.jp,Nobukazu Ishizaka,"A case of IgG4-related lymphadenopathy, pericarditis, coronary artery periarteritis and luminal stenosis."
tjoscanoae@gmail.com,Teodoro Julio Oscanoa-Espinoza,[Safety nonsteroidal antiinflammatory drugs].
ozgekorkmaz73@hotmail.com,Ozge Korkmaz,An unusual condition during internal jugular vein catheterisation: vertebral artery catheterisation.
lucas.mueller@gmail.com,Lucas O Müller,Enhanced global mathematical model for studying cerebral venous blood flow.
peter.norman2@btinternet.com,Peter Norman,Atrasentan Abbott.
vinay.bhole@bch.nhs.uk,Vinay Bhole,Transcatheter Retrieval of Cardiovascular Foreign Bodies in Children: A 15-Year Single Centre Experience.
alan.h.stokes@gsk.com,Alan H Stokes,Integrated approach to early detection of cardiovascular toxicity induced by a ghrelin receptor agonist.
cem.ekmekcioglu@meduniwien.ac.at,C Ekmekcioglu,Melatonin receptors in humans: biological role and clinical relevance.
adekmi@yahoo.com,Adelina Mihaescu,Of heart and kidney: a complicated love story.
rnelson@phx.niddk.nih.gov,Robert G Nelson,Cardiovascular autonomic neuropathy associates with nephropathy lesions in American Indians with type 2 diabetes.
sdickerson@pace.edu,Sally S Dickerson,"Social-evaluative threat, cognitive load, and the cortisol and cardiovascular stress response."
kub@ks.kyorin-u.ac.jp,Hiroshi Kubota,Epicardial infrared ablation to create a linear conduction block on a beating right atrium.
tbaudino@medicine.tamhsc.edu,Troy A Baudino,Dynamic cell-cell and cell-ECM interactions in the heart.
bocci@unsi.it,Velio Bocci,Ozone as Janus: this controversial gas can be either toxic or medically useful.
olga.pechanova@savba.sk,Olga Pechanova,Protective Effects of Nanoparticle-Loaded Aliskiren on Cardiovascular System in Spontaneously Hypertensive Rats.
arnold.m.katz@dartmouth.edu,A M Katz,Circulation Research: origin and early years.
hinck@biology.ucsc.edu,Lindsay Hinck,"The versatile roles of ""axon guidance"" cues in tissue morphogenesis."
jonas.doerner@uk-koeln.de,J Doerner,Effects of repetitive prolonged breath-hold in elite divers on myocardial fibrosis and cerebral morphology.
sechi@uniud.it,L A Sechi,Impact of omega-3 polyunsaturated fatty acids on vascular function and blood pressure: Relevance for cardiovascular outcomes.
twhayn0@uky.edu,Thomas F Jr Whayne,Coffee: A Selected Overview of Beneficial or Harmful Effects on the Cardiovascular System?
liy_xw@sina.com,Yun Li,SIRT1: role in cardiovascular biology.
beto.zam@gmail.com,Antonio Roberto Zamunér,Cardiovascular control in women with fibromyalgia syndrome: do causal methods provide nonredundant information compared with more traditional approaches?
priscilasouza_rc@yahoo.com.br,Priscila de Souza,"Bauhinia forficata link, a Brazilian medicinal plant traditionally used to treat cardiovascular disorders, exerts endothelium-dependent and independent vasorelaxation in thoracic aorta of normotensive and hypertensive rats."
hirohashi@yoshizawa.ecei.tohoku.ac.jp,Yoshihiro Hirohashi,Sensorless cardiac phase detection for synchronized control of ventricular assist devices using nonlinear kernel regression model.
a-tanaka@sss.fukushima-u.ac.jp,Akira Tanaka,Sensorless cardiac phase detection for synchronized control of ventricular assist devices using nonlinear kernel regression model.
priya.soma-pillay@up.ac.za,Priya Soma-Pillay,"The importance of cardiovascular pathology contributing to maternal death: Confidential Enquiry into Maternal Deaths in South Africa, 2011-2013."
aahmad2@vcu.edu,Ashfaq Ahmad,Role of Nitric Oxide in the Cardiovascular and Renal Systems.
dempseys@vcu.edu,Sara K Dempsey,Role of Nitric Oxide in the Cardiovascular and Renal Systems.
zpdaneva@vcu.edu,Zdravka Daneva,Role of Nitric Oxide in the Cardiovascular and Renal Systems.
malihazam@gmail.com,Maleeha Azam,Role of Nitric Oxide in the Cardiovascular and Renal Systems.
ningjun.li@vcuhealth.org,Ningjun Li,Role of Nitric Oxide in the Cardiovascular and Renal Systems.
pin-lan.li@vcuhealth.org,Pin-Lan Li,Role of Nitric Oxide in the Cardiovascular and Renal Systems.
joseph.ritter@vcuhealth.org,Joseph K Ritter,Role of Nitric Oxide in the Cardiovascular and Renal Systems.
drvenkatesans@yahoo.com,Venkatesan Sangareddi,An echocardiographic assessment of cardiovascular hemodynamics in patients with large pleural effusion.
sabit.cakmak@hc-sc.gc.ca,Sabit Cakmak,Metal composition of fine particulate air pollution and acute changes in cardiorespiratory physiology.
yan.zhang.4@ndsu.edu,Yan Zhang,A computer simulation of short-term adaptations of cardiovascular hemodynamics in microgravity.
dday@une.edu,Danielle S Day,Exercise physiologists talk about sex differences.
g.barbaro@tin.it,Giuseppe Barbaro,"HIV infection, highly active antiretroviral therapy and the cardiovascular system."
jean-xavier.mazoit@u-psud.fr,Jean-Xavier Mazoit,Local anesthetics and their adjuncts.
eric.larose@criucpq.ulaval.ca,Eric Larose,Visceral/epicardial adiposity in nonobese and apparently healthy young adults: association with the cardiometabolic profile.
mina_poorrajab@yahoo.com,Fatemeh Pourrajab,"The master switchers in the aging of cardiovascular system, reverse senescence by microRNA signatures; as highly conserved molecules."
mislam@lecom.edu,Mohammed A Islam,Cardiovascular effects of green tea catechins: progress and promise.
junjiexiao@shu.edu.cn,Junjie Xiao,Noncoding RNAs in Cardiovascular Aging.
wlautt@cc.umanitoba.ca,W W Lautt,Should clinical cardiologists report total peripheral resistance or total peripheral conductance?
drhoriabalan@yahoo.com,H Bălan,New proofs concerning benefits from time-scheduled BP-lowering therapy.
colin.phoon@med.nyu.edu,Colin Kit Lun Phoon,Imaging tools for the developmental biologist: ultrasound biomicroscopy of mouse embryonic development.
christine.garnett@fda.hhs.gov,Christine Garnett,Scientific white paper on concentration-QTc modeling.
jonesl3@mskcc.org,Lee W Jones,Pre-exercise participation cardiovascular screening in a heterogeneous cohort of adult cancer patients.
sophie.astrof@gmail.com,Sophie Astrof,Mesodermal expression of integrin α5β1 regulates neural crest development and cardiovascular morphogenesis.
j.myburgh@unsw.edu.au,John A Myburgh,An appraisal of selection and use of catecholamines in septic shock - old becomes new again.
287ast@mail.ru,M G Glezer,[Not Available].
abhuiyan@unimelb.edu.au,Alauddin Bhuiyan,Retinal artery and venular caliber grading: a semi-automated evaluation tool.
eliz_nasa@yahoo.com.br,Elizângela Márcia de Carvalho Abreu,Cardiovascular autonomic control in paraplegic and quadriplegic.
kashyas@ccf.org,Sangeeta Kashyap,Cardiovascular and Renal Outcomes of Newer Anti-Diabetic Medications in High-Risk Patients.
bonnie.ky@uphs.upenn.edu,Bonnie Ky,"Early Changes in Cardiovascular Biomarkers with Contemporary Thoracic Radiation Therapy for Breast Cancer, Lung Cancer, and Lymphoma."
glasser@epi.umn.edu,S P Glasser,"On arterial physiology, pathophysiology of vascular compliance, and cardiovascular disease."
tepmanas.bup@mahidol.ac.th,Tepmanas Bupha-Intr,20-Hydroxyecdysone attenuates cardiac remodeling in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
23a12@list.ru,V I Dolgova,[Psychophysiological monitoring of women teachers at the turn of the body of middle and old age.].
cnavarrovalverde@gmail.com,Cristina Navarro-Valverde,Effect of calcifediol treatment on cardiovascular outcomes in patients with acute coronary syndrome and percutaneous revascularization.
u.tayal@rbht.nhs.uk,U Tayal,Image reconstruction in cardiovascular CT: Part 2 - Iterative reconstruction; potential and pitfalls.
laurence.king@rmh.nhs.uk,L King,Image reconstruction in cardiovascular CT: Part 2 - Iterative reconstruction; potential and pitfalls.
rebeccaschofield@doctors.org.uk,R Schofield,Image reconstruction in cardiovascular CT: Part 2 - Iterative reconstruction; potential and pitfalls.
elly.castellano@rmh.nhs.uk,I Castellano,Image reconstruction in cardiovascular CT: Part 2 - Iterative reconstruction; potential and pitfalls.
james.stirrup@royalberkshire.nhs.uk,J Stirrup,Image reconstruction in cardiovascular CT: Part 2 - Iterative reconstruction; potential and pitfalls.
francois.pontana@chru-lille.fr,F Pontana,Image reconstruction in cardiovascular CT: Part 2 - Iterative reconstruction; potential and pitfalls.
jpearls@yahoo.com,J Earls,Image reconstruction in cardiovascular CT: Part 2 - Iterative reconstruction; potential and pitfalls.
e.nicol@nhs.net,E Nicol,Image reconstruction in cardiovascular CT: Part 2 - Iterative reconstruction; potential and pitfalls.
mmosing@vetclinics.uzh.ch,Martina Mosing,Continuous positive airway pressure (CPAP) decreases pulmonary shunt in anaesthetized horses.
t.iskratsch@qmul.ac.uk,Thomas Iskratsch,"Costameres, dense plaques and podosomes: the cell matrix adhesions in cardiovascular mechanosensing."
nforbang@gmail.com,Nketi I Forbang,Associations of diabetes mellitus and other cardiovascular disease risk factors with decline in the ankle-brachial index.
garret@upenn.edu,Garret A FitzGerald,The Cardiovascular Pharmacology of Nonsteroidal Anti-Inflammatory Drugs.
h.maddock@coventry.ac.uk,Helen Maddock,Predictivity of in vitro non-clinical cardiac contractility assays for inotropic effects in humans--A literature search.
barakzmd@gmail.com,Barak Zafrir,Low cardiorespiratory fitness and coronary artery calcification: Complementary cardiovascular risk predictors in asymptomatic type 2 diabetics.
me-goto@hirosaki-u.ac.jp,Takeshi Goto,Hydrodynamic evaluation of a new dispersive aortic cannula (Stealthflow).
karyn.cochran@maine.edu,Karyn S Kunzelman,Fluid-Structure Interaction Analysis of Papillary Muscle Forces Using a Comprehensive Mitral Valve Model with 3D Chordal Structure.
awang@dsi.com,Antonia C Wang,Assessment of the Cardiovascular Risk of Olmesartan Medoxomil-Based Treatment: Meta-Analysis of Individual Patient Data.
zclayton@uoregon.edu,Zachary S Clayton,Egg consumption and heart health: A review.
razi.khan@mail.mcgill.ca,R Khan,Identifying and understanding the role of pulmonary vein activity in atrial fibrillation.
drcdkim@knu.ac.kr,Chan-Duck Kim,Impact of Conversion From Cyclosporine to Tacrolimus on Glucose Metabolism and Cardiovascular Risk Profiles in Long-Term Stable Kidney Transplant Recipients.
john.floras@utoronto.ca,John S Floras,Sympathetic Nervous System in Patients with Sleep Related Breathing Disorders.
d.goldspink@ljmu.ac.uk,David F Goldspink,Ageing and activity: their effects on the functional reserve capacities of the heart and vascular smooth and skeletal muscles.
entcheva@bme.jhu.edu,E Entcheva,Influence of the electric axis of stimulation on the induced transmembrane potentials in ellipsoidal bidomain heart.
michael.sticherling@derma.imed.uni-erlangen.de,M Sticherling,The role of endothelin in connective tissue diseases.
rahul@physics.iisc.ernet.in,Rahul Pandit,Reentry via high-frequency pacing in a mathematical model for human-ventricular cardiac tissue with a localized fibrotic region.
simonpe@uni-mainz.de,Perikles Simon,Direct measurement of cell-free DNA from serially collected capillary plasma during incremental exercise.
dmitry.mayorov@baker.edu.au,Dmitry N Mayorov,Brain superoxide as a key regulator of the cardiovascular response to emotional stress in rabbits.
yarmohammadihassan@yahoo.com,Hassan Yarmohammadi,"Ibn al-Quff (1233-1286 AD), a medieval Arab surgeon and physician."
shujismz@ri.ncvc.go.jp,Shuji Shimizu,Lumped parameter model for hemodynamic simulation of congenital heart diseases.
nchattip@gmail.com,Nipon Chattipakorn,The effects of proprotein convertase subtilisin/kexin type 9 inhibitors on lipid metabolism and cardiovascular function.
pooja.bhati092@gmail.com,Pooja Bhati,Exercise training and cardiac autonomic function in type 2 diabetes mellitus: A systematic review.
shwet1999@yahoo.com,Shweta Shenoy,Exercise training and cardiac autonomic function in type 2 diabetes mellitus: A systematic review.
ehusain@jmi.ac.in,M Ejaz Hussain,Exercise training and cardiac autonomic function in type 2 diabetes mellitus: A systematic review.
alma.martelli@farm.unipi.it,Alma Martelli,Pharmacological characterization of the vascular effects of aryl isothiocyanates: is hydrogen sulfide the real player?
lara.testai@farm.unipi.it,Lara Testai,Pharmacological characterization of the vascular effects of aryl isothiocyanates: is hydrogen sulfide the real player?
valentina.citi@libero.it,Valentina Citi,Pharmacological characterization of the vascular effects of aryl isothiocyanates: is hydrogen sulfide the real player?
alice.marino@for.unipi.it,Alice Marino,Pharmacological characterization of the vascular effects of aryl isothiocyanates: is hydrogen sulfide the real player?
breschi@farm.unipi.it,Maria C Breschi,Pharmacological characterization of the vascular effects of aryl isothiocyanates: is hydrogen sulfide the real player?
calderone@farm.unipi.it,Vincenzo Calderone,Pharmacological characterization of the vascular effects of aryl isothiocyanates: is hydrogen sulfide the real player?
shengwang_gz@163.com,Sheng Wang,Chinese Society of Anesthesiology Expert Consensus on Anesthetic Management of Cardiac Surgical Patients With Suspected or Confirmed Coronavirus Disease 2019.
maheguillaume@yahoo.fr,G Mahé,"[Endothelial function: role, assessment and limits]."
danielsd@buffalo.edu,Derek Daniels,Angiotensin II (de)sensitization: Fluid intake studies with implications for cardiovascular control.
bozena.stepniak@umlub.pl,Bożena Targońska-Stępniak,Diastolic dysfunction in rheumatoid arthritis patients with low disease activity.
yxw22@psu.edu,Yi Wu,Adaptive physiological speed/flow control of rotary blood pumps in permanent implantation using intrinsic pump parameters.
f.b.eddy@dundee.ac.uk,F B Eddy,Role of nitric oxide in larval and juvenile fish.
dan.greitz@ks.se,Dan Greitz,On the active vascular absorption of plasma proteins from tissue: rethinking the role of the lymphatic system.
jietang@csu.edu.cn,Jie Tang,AGXT2: An unnegligible aminotransferase in cardiovascular and urinary systems.
chenxp74@hotmail.com,Xiao-Ping Chen,AGXT2: An unnegligible aminotransferase in cardiovascular and urinary systems.
pascalbousquet@medecine.u-strasbg.fr,P Bousquet,"I1 receptors, cardiovascular function, and metabolism."
michael.axelsson@bioenv.gu.se,Michael Axelsson,Exploring nature's natural knockouts: in vivo cardiorespiratory performance of Antarctic fishes during acute warming.
pitini@hotmail.it,Chiara Cencioni,Sirtuin function in aging heart and vessels.
fspallotta@gmail.com,Francesco Spallotta,Sirtuin function in aging heart and vessels.
antonello.mai@gmail.com,Antonello Mai,Sirtuin function in aging heart and vessels.
afarsetti@gmail.com,Antonella Farsetti,Sirtuin function in aging heart and vessels.
zeiher@em.uni-frankfurt.de,Andreas M Zeiher,Sirtuin function in aging heart and vessels.
gaetano@em.uni-frankfurt.de,Carlo Gaetano,Sirtuin function in aging heart and vessels.
jonathan.chernoff@fccc.edu,Jonathan Chernoff,p21-Activated Kinase 2 Regulates Endothelial Development and Function through the Bmk1/Erk5 Pathway.
glondon@club-internet.fr,Gérald M London,Brachial arterial pressure to assess cardiovascular structural damage: an overview and lessons from clinical trials.
jerzy.beltowski@am.lublin.pl,Jerzy Bełtowski,"Apelin and visfatin: unique ""beneficial"" adipokines upregulated in obesity?"
crestani@fcfar.unesp.br,Carlos C Crestani,Influence of pre-existing hypertension on neuroendocrine and cardiovascular changes evoked by chronic stress in female rats.
vandres@cnic.es,Vicente Andrés,Mechanisms of vascular aging: What can we learn from Hutchinson-Gilford progeria syndrome?
crodriguezs@santpau.cat,Cristina Rodríguez,Mechanisms of vascular aging: What can we learn from Hutchinson-Gilford progeria syndrome?
